Since this is my first year in Kindergarten, after 25 years in 5th grade, I was amazed to see that at times my kiddos would rush to get their work done. I thought that was just a "fifth-grade" thing. Kindergarteners actually know how to slack off now and then - already? I was wracking my brain for a way to make my kindergarteners produce quality work each and every day ~ so it became a "habit" for them to be very proud of creating nice and neat work daily.
Just Because…I love you; Just Because…I appreciate you; Just Because…I wanted to!
Yesterday was a day to remember. I had a great experience for a first time.
“Can’t even tell you how excited we are about this!” Colleen wrote. “Jennifer Lopez is coming to HSN on July 2nd!! One of my all time favorite’s – Can’t wait to meet her and introduce her to all of you! PS – Be sure to enter HSN’s sweepstakes to win a trip for two to FL to meet Jennifer in person!”
Now this latter case – sometimes called co-production – might be a good thing. It might stop professionals telling communities what to do and instead, and at last, empower local people. But in other cases is it really an abdication? In some situations it can be dangerous – not just literally in terms of health and safety, but in its effects.
I say 'Because we're going to wreck the bar football machine now.' Earlier we did indeed see two bar football tables. 'When we score a goal we've to shout 'G-O-O-O-O-O-O-O-O-L!!!' like they do on Spanish TV.'
Thoughts on my Dream
The preparations that I am going to be making this summer will actually be for the upcoming school year. The space that I'm going to be setting aside will be filled with school books and supplies. My big change is that, beginning next school year, I'm going to be homeschooling my son!
And it still sounds great.
Yes, let’s see how far we’ve come…
No they're not. This is another example from the Jingle All The Way school of poster wrecks; slap a Christmas tree in the background and they don;t even HAVE to mention a holiday in the poster. That'll get the holiday crowd in. And while everyone else looks okay, somehow Bob DeNiro got stuck in the Brundlefly machine with Luke Wilson, then got airbrushed, then someone went and Magic Markered some eyebrows on him. Vandals!
The deep sky spun with stars, no moon.
Yes, I received the N I requested, for my first name and it is delicate and lovely and can be converted to a necklace. SCORE!
current reality in the market
‘Well, suppose if we went and got hold of Dugg and…’
and my last $20........
My neice is on Facebook. She's kinda bent out of shape, talking obliquely about her son and a mysterious "label". I send her a note.
There's a richness of Baseball history involved with Newark that predates even that of the Yankees and Mets. Fielding competitive teams as 19th century amateurs; independents; Negro League members; or being Minor League Champions, Newark's Baseball tradition proudly sports over a century's worth of tales of the game.
queen of dysfunction....(you crack ME up!) i am indeed in savannah! we love it here, so of course, i'd reccommend relocating! as to being hounded out of town...hell, sugar, i'm still here ..this is a very tolerant place, but like any small town, you have to look at what you need and want for you and your family. my pic was taken out in los angeles...we were in the parking structure at the Grove mall...i was wearing a multi-colored thin cotton scarf.
All about the Blissful Beach Couples Shower:
As much as I wanted to strangle Elle for calling us for the fourth time in seven days, I treated her as I’d treat a family member.
And now we have the Harry Potter Studio Tour, which is probably the closest we’ll ever get to the theme park (although I’m still hoping it will one day open on our shores). The hype surrounding the contents of the tour was intense, the wait for the opening was long and the anticipation of the Potter fandom was high. It finally opened on Saturday 31 March and the
Angels “The Power of Love”
Affirmation: “My heart is filled with love .”
Every year at this time I come down with a bad case of the gardening bug. It slowly builds up inside me, an ocassional thought here and there . . . turns into an all consuming desire to dig my hands into a bag of potting soil.
After reading this post from Donna Maria's Indie Business Blog, I felt inspired to write my own list of personal core values. Identifying your deepest values can give you a "life-direction compass"and help you determine if you're on the right path or way off. If you're spending time and energy on activities that are not in alignment with your list of core values, you'll end up feeling burned out, resentful and exhausted.
I'm broody. WTF is that about. I can't stop thinking about wanting another kid. I'm not even out the woods with Em yet, I'm still making it up as I go along and here I am pondering reproducing again. Hell I'm not even off my meds yet. Hormones? My clock ticking? Who knows, I just know that I have to suck it up for now. I want a year off. A year of not trying, not stressing, not being pregnant, not breastfeeding. A year of nice times, holidays with family and just a lot less stress.
Once again the thing that MasterChef does better than any other cooking show on TV is make every dish look fantastic. It helps that the sets are epic, and the production values are top notch, but when even the crappy dishes come off looking like something you’d want to devour it puts MasterChef in a class above the pretenders. I’m not sure whether it’s the food presentation or the lack of snark from the contestants and the judges but there’s something about MasterChef that just feels classier than My Kitchen Rules which often felt gritty and underdone to me.
Going from 400/800 (not too terrible – instant cast stuff taking 1 – 2 seconds) to 15000/20000 or so… Yeah. Instant cast flight form? Took a full 30 seconds. Quest box open? Same.
Find a job somewhere.
Can you believe all ten women are in a geographic area that is relatively convenient for all to travel?
Again, for my own edification, I'm going to try and post the recipes over the next few days (weeks???) and specs for each of the beers listed above. Unfortunately, I don't have tasting notes on any of them, but I hope to have notes for the Coconut Porter, Wheat Stout, and Hefeweizen, as well as all brews going forward.
Ink: So Saffron
And another thing: you’ve got to be even more ignorant if you think all Americans act like the ones in the Rick Mercer report and that we believe all of the stereotypes about Canadians out there.
From the beginning, KANSAS achieved success by playing only their original music. This "garage band" from Topeka was discovered by Wally Gold, who worked for Don Kirshner, and released their first album in 1974. The band has produced eight gold albums, three sextuple-Platinum albums (Leftoverture, Point of Know Return, Best of), one platinum live album (Two for the Show) and a million-selling gold single, ‘Dust in the Wind.’ KANSAS appeared on the Billboard charts for over 200 weeks throughout the ‘70's and ‘80's and played to sold-out arenas and stadiums throughout North America, Europe and Japan.
* Developing and implementing agency's yearly fundraising goals and plan of action, in conjunction with the board, development team and upper management teams;
Even with having to remove the liner after a few hours, I enjoyed the next few nights snore free. If I didn't think that he would notice, I would rub the liner on his pillow every night to get just a little bit of the essential oils onto it so that I could continue to enjoy snore free nights.
Michael – ‘Eternal Creator and Lord Protector of the Supreme-Ultimate programs of the Lords of Light and hosts in the ‘father universe’. He ensures that the variations of Light are part of the true spectrum derived from the Lords of Light. (Dan. 12:1-4). Protector of transformation functions of “the image” (selem), which can neither be created nor destroyed withour Michael’s coordination of “equivalence.” (Dan. 12:2; Jude 8,9). Head of “High Command” and Lord of YHWH who works with Gabriel for the restoration of spiritual and galactic realms. (Rev. 12:7,8; Dan 10:13). A “trinitized expression” of God the Absolute, with Metatron and Melchizedek working together for the opening of unending vistas of new worlds seeded according to the “Books of Life” and the revealed expression of the Ancient of Days. (Dan. 12:8-10; 7:10). His name, Mik-ky-ilu (Mikal) is used by the Paradise sons and the Patriarchs for the restoration of the power of Light.
He will do it again. Call those times of deliverance to remembrance and express
The Doctor classes the Monk a Time Meddler and berates him for breaking the golden rule. "Never, never interfere." To which the Monk replies "And who says so!" Indeed he does! The Monk's intentions are finally revealed when he admits that he wants to improve things, speed them up! Make Harold King, change the course of history, to have jet planes by the 13th century and enable Shakespeare to do Hamlet on television.
Except, that isn't the same anymore. That is a part of the past, and my therapist told me that it sounds like I'm holding onto the past and the things I used to like about him. I say used to, because things have changed. He's no longer the cool kid, now he is probably one of the people from that crowd that has slipped the furthest. He has put me through a lot, and it's kind of embarrassing. It was embarrassing back then when he would verbally abuse me in front of people, but somehow I still felt important. Now, he doesn't open any doors for me (literally or figuratively), if anything, the opposite is true nowadays.
It’s also interesting to compare DDLJ to a more recent Khan romance, Kal Ho Naa Ho, to see how much foreign-set Bollywood films have changed over a few short years. The entirety of the latter film is set on foreign soil (in this case, New York City), and the characters are as comfortable conversing in English as in their “native” Indian languages. Both the women and men dress primarily in Western fashions, and the heroine is as focused on career matters as she is on family and romance. In less than a decade, these seemingly surface affects demonstrate a deeper blend of cultures that has become naturalized in members of younger Indian generations.
With hypnotic fleshy lips
My thanks again to Wendi for sharing this fabulous and tasty beverage.
If you'd like more information, or would like to place an order, just let me know. I'll be making some samples in the coming weeks, so watch this space! Now I'm off to carry on devising my classes for this year.
For the record, I have to mention that it is not about things like a lack of memory card slot because that is the individual choice of Microsoft and I mean things that I use in a phone on a daily basis.
And then later on when they are ready for a teen bed you can use it horizontally like I did above with a full bed. You could also easily use liquid nails to glue a piece of wood or mdf to the side to make it larger for a queen or king.
The writer is a wife and mother who works full-time as an emergency 911 dispatcher.
First off can I just say I didn’t even realize it was April Fools until 6 o’clock at night which means I didn’t pull a single prank! I mean can you imagine the fun I could have had with my host family? Seran(how the heck do you spell that?) wrap on the toilet, short sheeting their bed, replace salt for sugar, oh man did I miss the boat on that one!
as the dream and the dreamer
Our almost-instinct almost true:
Its easier to throw clothes away than give them away.
This week I will probably add earrings, necklaces, bracelets, rings, etc. on my Etsy shop. I will also make a sweet deco case for iPhone with silicon whipped cream.
As the oarsmen pulled slowly away we all turned and took a long look at the mighty vessel towering high above our midget boat, and I know it must have been the most extraordinary sight I shall ever be called upon to witness; I realize now how totally inadequate language is to convey to some other person who was not there any real impression of what we saw.
And like I said before, daddy was alot more slow and mama would say "chop that cabbage Tom before it decides to stand up and grow".
A typical medium level community order is defined on page 161 of the MCSG:
As I said at the beginning of this piece, it was a great weekend and everyone involved deserves massive credit for it. I'm really looking forward to next year - I'm just hoping some people get a clue in the mean time.
Raisin Cake
rachel is that girl i love and hate all at the same time. she is beautiful, thin, talented, looks like she walks out of a perfectly styled magazine each & every day, and has all of the designer items in her closet that i dream of one day having for my very own. so much good all in one little tiny person?! so. not. fair. and the real kicker? she's completely nice, too! the lovely fashionista behind the incredibly fast growing pink peonies is also a full-time freelance graphic designer and a full-time student. you go girl! aaaaand she just may or may not be giving away a fabulous piece of jewelry tonight. you probably don't want to miss your chance at that!
Make plum sized balls with the mix and roll out.
Thank you for signing up for SchoolsMovingUp’s webinar, “A National Perspective of K-12 Online and Blended Learning: Current Issues and Trends in Policy and Practice.” This is a reminder that this webinar will take place this Wednesday, May 2, from 10:30 a.m. – 12:00 p.m. Pacific Time (1:30 p.m. – 3:00 p.m. Eastern Time.) Directions to accessing the live event website (i.e., URL and conference call) are posted below.
Morello: Good. That’s all of them.
Morning.
...something is significantly wrong with a creature that sacrifices its children's lives to settle its differences.
- Eh… filth? I am planting oak trees, sir.”
1st begets 2nd (10,000 becomes 20,000)
I have been trying for months to articulate my feelings about two little words in the English language that, when put next to each other, cause the breath to catch in my throat: Living memory.
The protest called Occupy Wall Street is not about begrudging the rich. Although, I have seen and heard recently, many people begrudging the poor. This is not about beating up on capitalism. This is about fairness and injustices. It is about American’s Democracy eroding away for the 99%ers. It is about losing our Democracy to Corporate Governance.
And I sure don’t trust any politician or government official who says that developers and hotel owners are responsible enough to operate and monitor their own sewerage treatment plants.
Impudent heart, pray what did possess you
But Bakshi, in his time away, seems to have become unsure of himself as a director. Look at a curious scene in a La Vegas nightclub where Deebs and Holli (in human form) have a date and she is wanting to do everything possible - sniffing people, tasting everything, letting all of her senses go wild. But it never builds, escalates or evolves into anything remotely funny. Things just happen and they flash between human and cartoon form with little to no interest from anyone else.
I have been in Deepdoodoo many times; the older I get, the easier it is to get there. I actually kind of enjoy it there.
His keen interest in chemistry resulted in his accidental invention of these 'friction lights', as he called them, the year before. He wiped a stick covered with a mixture of potassium chlorate and antimony sulphide on his hearth at his home. The scientist Michael Faraday attempted to persuade Walker to take out a patent on his invention, but he chose not to claiming that he was a doctor and not an inventor.
I feel the same about link engineers that put my beautiful websites - with beautiful unique content - into crappy link locations or do not know how to comment on my behalf without using spam! I have stopped hiring these link specialists at all and use screened USA assistants ... you should be careful who you permit help market your web content, too!!!
Coplans in China
let it happily
We are so amazed each day by this girl. She understands so much, it's unbelievable sometimes. Just a little sponge.
I assumed that the third one must have come up on the pile just in time for someone's coffee break, so I'd get it the following day--yesterday.
BS in Mass Communication, Strategic Communication
I like the second one enormously, but then again, I sniggered when I noticed that we send our mortgage payment to an office on "Big Beaver Road."
(For further perspectives on the ethics and consequences of such tactics, see the Activist Ethics and Activism and the Law chapters.)
turn from the path of life aside.
Rating: Liked
“I was being nice and respectful to a lady, no one ever teach you to do that?”. They reached the stairs and started climbing up. Geoff was silent on the way up but he started talking again when they were heading down the next corridor.
We start with a drink at the bar. The Pear Green Tea Martini is exceptional, displaying all the aroma and ittybittiness of fresh pear. Floating on the top is a pear crisp, so sweet and delectable you might wonder why anyone ever bothered making chips from potatoes.
The babies do not stop with the cows. Our mother cat has taken over the doghouse and is getting ready for new kittens. We expect to see them in a week or two. It takes about 5 or 6 new kittens each year to have enough survive and keep our furball (cat) population stable. A stable furball population is important on a farm or ranch. Too many furballs results in diseases and unhealthy cats, but too few furballs results in rodents and other varmints getting too close to the house and chickens. We try to spay and neuter as necessary to walk this line.
Gros plan et Copics utilisés...
Class II Feasts: Only 1 collect, unless another Class II feast is overridden, then add a second collect for the overridden feast
- Stir to moisten then pour into greased loaf pan.
The most intricate and interesting plots ever devised in the human mind seem to inevitably end up on paper. When I find a good book and have the time I can sit and read for hours on end. In the fall, I enjoy hunting. But after sitting in a tree stand for twelve hours in one day, enjoying the outdoors gets old quickly. So I sit outside in the beautiful woods or on the edge of a frost covered field and read…and read…and read. I turn a lot of pages during hunting season, and it is by far my favorite time of year.
Kreisleriana opened with a movement by turns tempestuous and dreamily poetic, Florestan and Eusebius setting the scene for the work as a whole. The two ensuing intermezzi evoked a similar, continued contrast and competition, which yet retained common poetic ground. Scales were transmuted into something so much more in the third movement, whilst the fifth imparted a fine sense of a snapshot, neither begun nor completed, but rather revealed to us for a while. The opening of the final movement flickered like Schubert’s Irrlicht, though was always underpinned by absolute rhythmic security. Its passionate central section was striking for its unforced sincerity: that both of pianist and composer.
So I grabbed a small enough tension rod from Amazon and when it came I got to work. First I put down non-adhesive shelf liner, stashed away all my Cascade, sponges and Jet Dry that we will use later, put the tension rod up and voila! The whole project took me less than 15 minutes to do, and it's such a breath of fresh air to open that cabinet now! It went from a sloppy, disorganized mess to this!
violet
“Rather than seeing the regeneration as a negative thing, I think it’s quite the opposite and we fully expect Matt to deliver.
3:16-17 – Theophylact draws a typological connection between the Spirit descending on Christ and the dove returning with an olive twig to the ark. It’s a connection worth pondering and admiring, though I’m hesitant to read it into the text. At the same time, this being the Gospel according to Matthew (aimed at a primarily Jewish audience), it is possible that Matthew had this in mind in his framing of the narrative.
The Unconsecrated will never relent.
Mitch: Dozens.
That's it for me today. I've got a couple of tutorials in the works that I want to try and get finished and hopefully posted over the next week. In the meantime, enjoy your weekend everyone!
The Doll: The Lost Short Stories by Daphne du Maurier
....3 - ARe
Obama, what is your deal
I’m hoping not for a miraculously good finish time on Sunday, but I am hoping for two things in regards to the run:
but those 2 long braids she had so often well made up for it. I loved
Question: Ropewalk Tavern has a relatively large beer selection, one that many folks in the hinterlands would kill for. Why does that bar remain relatively unnoticed by beer enthusiasts in this area?
Bourbon
He is suing for damages related to mental distress and anxiety in addition to all child support expenses paid and payable by him.
With you representing the royal house of Pahang, the last time the royal houses were brought into the fray of politics pre-2008 was when we headed for independence. Since the last elections, there has been an unprecedented involvement of the royal houses, especially in Selangor and Perak.
I guess I knew it would. In all honesty, I wanted to make you a little uncomfortable. Not very nice of me, and I question my own motives: Why drag ya'll down with us on this one?
- Movies – We rarely pay full price for a movie – get a free sim card from Orange on Google and this gives you half price movies every Wednesday when you take a friend. We also see a lot of free movie previews which cost nothing. Savings are around £50 so far this year, compared to paying ticket prices.
Yep, our goal is to help others find their smile, find that small moment of laughter. Be the person who gives them that smile that might just get them through their day.
This is Sunkapa. He has leprosy and he can no longer work. Therefore, his wife is forced to work, and so are his kids. He has no choice but to be a beggar. Heartbreaking.
Poor thing. He’ll never be the same. I scowled. His parents should have paid more attention. Now that poor kid will pay the price. My jaw tightened and my hand closed around the pole till my knuckles turned white.
“I just don’t think Americans are angry at people who go out, work hard and show talent and make the world a better place,” she said. “Do we hate Steve Jobs or Bill Gates?…I think the real class warfare that Americans are hopping mad about is the class warfare between those of us who pay taxes and the people’s whose salary they pay — for their fabulous pensions and they’re partying trips to Las Vegas. And visiting whores in Colombia, and the highest-income counties in the nation not being Beverly Hills or Grosse Point or Greenwich, Conn., but counties all around the seat of government in Washington, D.C.”
The stamps used are THE Wendy Vecchi Botanical Art and the flowers are Lord Tim of Holtz Tattered Florals ... you know Tim ... the man that designed every flower known to the most expert of experts while making a scale model of the new Olympic Stadium on the top of a pin head with just a Distress Marker Pen and a swoosh of Distress Stain.
While they retained their personalities, the members of the band seemed to shift identities with each album. The frat rock-rap of the debut, the sample heavy in-joke LA vibe of the second, punk-funk-rap stews of the 1990s, and the more electronic old school albums of their later years (spanning from Hello Nasty to To the 5 Boroughs), represented not only their aesthetic and artistic tastes, but natural human maturity. When MCA turned to Buddhism and the band seemed to implicitly condemn the message of its License to Ill in the 1990s (yeah I know they have been quoted as calling it “satire,” yet they played so few songs from it live; it remains a real question), some people called them out on it, hypocrisy they cried. Yet, if we’ve learned anything since the rise of reality television and social media it might be that to be trapped by who you are at 30 by who you were at 20 seems a fate worse than death. In 2006, Ad Rock married Riot Grrrl and noted feminist Kathleen Hanna. Could anyone have predicted that in 1986? While MCA’s Buddhism never appealed to me, it had more to do with my own religious upbringing. Twelve years of parochial Catholic school, for all its positives, generally dulled my attraction to religion.
Light brown or white felt.
Unfortunately, in most cases, kids with a few drinks under their belt feel invincible.
Yeah, the other scales died in the interim (did not break apart, smart-arse!) so one can't be too exact about the delta here, but the irrefutable fact is that E@L is down close enough to 12kgs. That's 26lbs for the two readers E@L has in the States. Another way of looking at it is that he is down by 10% on his previous weight. This is lowest he has been since a drastic reduction (to 114.5kgs) for his 30 year school reunion in 2005. He was still told he was fucking fat though, by someone who was a fatty at school, now thin - rudeness is not exclusively Singapore thing after all.)
And a wonderful thank you for friends and bloggers alike who kept their faith in me and choose
The purpose of the retreat is to provide caregivers with a stress-free, relaxing day. You do not have to worry about travel, as Friends of Hospice Ottawa has arranged for a bus to take you to and from the venue. The entire day is yours to spend as you wish, and there are several different relaxing and energizing activities for you to choose from.
I just finished reading Prodigal Summer by Barbara Kingsolver. I adored it. She is an inspiration for me…She can write about things in a way that is so detailed and knowledgeable, and yet it’s so accessible because she writes characters that you fall in love with. And boy, she really lets you get to know the place she’s writing about, as well.
Tom Ford White Patchouli ($80 for 30 ml.)
Olive oil, 1 teaspoon
Our final day is spent shopping. Minh and I pound the pavement at the One Utama shopping centre, shopping for twelve hours from 10am until 10pm. We break for food in the local food court, and before we leave there's even room for a final 1m roti tisu, a fitting mega-sized farewell to our group of voracious food bloggers.
"Professional gambler Sloane Keller is tired of dating weak willed men and longs to meet a man who challenges her dominant personality and forces her to submit. As the Queen of Cards, she’s used to making her own rules and craves the excitement of Vegas. But her inner heart cries out for someone who can be her match, both inside the casino and in the bedroom.
We need to see the sharing of the info as the first step in a conversation that aims toward better results.
It's days like this that I feel as though I could just curl up and die. It's hard as hell to go on living knowing that my baby is gone.Yes, I know that I have other children that I must continue caring for. Don't worry - I won't go off and kill myself - I couldn't do that to my other babies. They've all been through enough. It's just that I feel such a depth of despair that I had no idea was even possible.
Cane Sugar 1.5 lbs.
The Bible defines faith as substance and evidence. It is more than just a set of beliefs, it is the essential element which gives us clarity and certainty in the promises of the Bible. Is is foundational to the truths of God’s Word and without it we cannot even begin to know or please God.
Indeed, the liberal capitalism as the dominant intellectual category is the default position in almost every “average intelligent” contrary opinion to which meta-contrariness arises. Hegel seems to be vindicated on structure more and more analytically, no? This could be my own confirmation bias, but the social signaling mirroring Hegelian dialectics IS telling. Then the way liberal position represents the “Current traditionalism” of the educated is also pretty clear.
Let us not overlook Lysius, the chief captain. The Lord had prepared him to be ready for this unusual turn of events. This is a perfect example of 1 Corinthians 10:13. “There hath no temptation taken you but such as is common to man, but God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be tempted above that ye are able; but will with the temptation also make a way to escape, that ye may be able to bear it.”
Ergosterol – See Vitamin D.
- The fantastic external sound card that I use to MP3 up LP's and tapes wont work on it...
It also seems that parents who invoke Santa in a desperate attempt to get their kids to behave need to turn in their ACLU cards—for, as Neal explained, “Santa Claus is but a user friendly symbol of the State’s capacity not only to engage in blatant forms of surveillance, but to essentially police behavior in the absence of actual surveillance . . . How many parents have exploited their children’s knowledge that Santa ‘knows when you are bad or good’ as a means of reigning in bad behavior.”
I realize that a film such as this isn't going to be the best representation of the body of work Bolo Yeung has put out over the years, but I thought it might be kind of cool to start out with a rare and silly film that he not only choreographed and starred in... but FUCKING DIRECTED.
Meanwhile, in a medium sauce pan combine water, milk, butter, seasonings, garlic and garlic powder to a boil, but stirring during.
For a discussion of the chances of James Murdoch and David Cameron, follow the links on their names. It would probably be fair to say that the latter’s performance in the House today improved his chances somewhat: but that, as ever, they depend on what else emerges as time goes on.
This was worrying. As Dearest left the lounge she could hear the other residents saying she shouldn't have told us about my Mam as she wasn't supposed to go out alone. In effect they were accusing her of 'dobbing' my Mam in. It was hard to believe that she had been out at all never mind get herself to Manchester and back,
“I guess the book is useless then. Anyway, that’ll be 50 coins for the room unless you want any royalties.”
The artwork, which could have improved my opinion of this series, did exactly the opposite. It’s very sparse in terms of detail, and not at all attractive. The best way to describe the main fault is that it’s quite . . droopy. Most of the characters have almost limp posture, clothing, and hair. In addition, there’s something that bothers me about the character’s faces; at any given moment, they seem either lifeless or annoying. It’s just not a very good-looking manga, and it definitely isn’t on par with the greatness of the original.
I hope you enjoy the third challenge!
The killer of the light
R L Stevenson – The Bodysnatcher
The phases of the diet are:
I have to mention the gross continuity error here. Chekov knows all about Khan andKhan recognizes him in spite of the fact Chekov wasnot on the series in the episode featuring khan. Fans rationalize Chekov must have been a low ranking officer who had not joined the bridge crew yet I will go along with that.
My dinner: A veggie burger with lots of iceburg lettuce, pickles, catsup and mustard, on half a pita, and some of the leftover coleslaw. I also snacked on some wheat crackers, and had a blueberry Larabar.
Schaumburg I, Boldssen JL. Time to pregnancy and pregnancy outcome among Danish textile, clothing, and footwear workers. Scand J Soc Med 1992; 20: 100-114.
Wow! This has been one time-warped illusion. It’s hard to keep all my thoughts straight. It feels like one month’s worth of activities is happening in a day. Today we spent the day with the GROW children. They are so very special and cared for. They are group of wonderful children. So fun and crazy like their mom, Faa. We gave them the “American experience,” by taking them shopping in a mall. Something they never had the opportunity to do previously.
There’s never any shortage of bad news but the occupy movement gives some cause for optimism since it shows that, in response to the sleazy powermongers of the world. the new generation are aware that apathy does not rule, ok.
Lately at the elementary school gardens I intern at we’ve been doing A LOT of mulching.
3) I will just have to make a bunch more shows to make this one seem less significant in my mind. It's the first one, it's a bit of a rehearsal for the rest of my program. If I didn't nail it, it won't matter in the larger picture.
I use the younger population figures for two reasons. The first is to show our immediate demographic future, the second is to draw attention to the fact that the 18-40 year old demographic is of military fighting age. It doesn’t matter if they are outnumbered today by grey haired, ancient Brits; the only thing that matters is that they will very soon outnumber our young indigenous potential defenders.
Level 12: 24% chance to deal 130% damage after an attack.
Oh, and one last note, even the plates were nice. It was really the tablecloth and curtains that were less appealing. Lots of potential if they just altered the decors a bit. :)
The child was a boy of about six, a cheerful boy whose smile showed a gap in his teeth. He was holding a model railway engine and wore long tartan trousers. The print had faded somewhat. Probably it was a boyhood photograph of the man now stacked carelessly out in the sheep shed.
They stuck on their cover a picture of Scotland and dubbing it 'Skintland'.
Now, with the economy as it is, we are seeing that there is tons of new job innovation, and the entrepreneurial base is growing enormously because people are forced to do something differently and think creatively and that is fundamentally what unschooling is.
$100.00 + $10. s/h
About 10 medium sizes pine cones (go around parks, wooded areas, friends/family)
Tuesday 22nd - 7pm
Peter Visti - Dolly
Wednesday, May 30
Some may think of this as a fashion faux pas, but one thing I like to wear in wintertime is sandals with black tights. I love that I can still rock my summer shoes in the cold weather - just keep warm with a cozy pair of opaque tights!
1 jar sliced jalapenos
Clench played on 1978's Street Action and 1979's Rock N' Roll Nights with BTO before the group disbanded.
Now a best-selling author, Vujicic suffered from depression as a child, but as he got older he eventually began to embrace his disability.
Halloween weekend for us started on Saturday as we got ready for the Illumination of the Jack-O-Lanterns in a local Gold Rush Town near us. It's a fun little "contest" for kids to carve their gourds and bring them to the town square to win awards.
Raw Rebound, featuring Chris Jericho vs CM Punk.
The old man laughed, and said,"Well name your poison son. And let's have a drink."
Onto this weeks challenge, which is a color combo, of Black & White. Please keep in mind that all challenges are optional. Any Christmas/Winter/Holiday is perfectly acceptable. The idea is to help you get your cards done ahead of time, and save you some stress, at the end of the year. Also, it is not necessary to use a SCRS stamp on your card, but we sure love it when you do!
Now, I think there is an important distinction to be made here: some parents proudly brag about how their teens aren't "rebellious," and what they really mean is that their children are obedient to their parents wishes (or, possibly more likely, are simply very good at hiding the aspects of their life that their parents would disapprove of). When I say that most unschoolers I know, myself included, don't or didn't "rebel" against our parents in our teen years, I don't mean it's because we fit the perfect-child model of some narrow-minded authoritarian-parenting suburbanite.
Disposable forks/spoons
M: There’s a big difference between can’t stay home and won’t.
11. Do you think your teenage years have influenced you as a writer? If so, how?
See her surrounded by energy
Sprinkle chopped coriander leaves on top and serve hot with steamed rice.
It depends what's under it.
Obama’s pitch to the youth is going to fall on deaf ears when so many will graduate from college with massive debt and cannot find jobs. Hope is a grand thing, but the real changes during his time in office have been for the worse among the entire swath of working Americans, many of whom have given up looking for a job. Let’s hope they vote for someone who knows how to create an economy that will produce jobs.
iso 400 F16 1/10 sec, tripod, 4 sec self timer. taken from on rocks at waters edge.
I went back to the shop again in the afternoon, as I was dying to try the food.
We are standing outside the middle school that Katie will attend in the fall, chatting with another couple. We’ve all just taken a tour of the school as part of the stepping up process for our children.
It seems that many people feel this way, mostly people from other countries, but also a great number of Americans, and in some cases (hard to believe, but true), New Yorkers. Their statements include, but are not limited to, and I paraphrase, but do not wander from the meaning:
Carter toured the devastated area for himself, witnessing that virtually no reconstruction in Gaza had taken place since the January Israeli bombings.
From the house we were eating at, we could see such a beautiful sunset, which was the photo I chose for day 47, the colors of the sky and the reflection of the sun on the water amazed me a lot.
3. You don’t know what you want to be when you finish school? So what!!! You’ll just change your mind anyway. I graduated from High school, started on a degree in Social Science, completed a Bachelor with majors in Psychology and Anthropology and now I’m doing a Graduate Diploma to become a teacher. Guess how many extra unit’s I have to do when compared with those who actually study teaching from the beginning. 2. That’s half of 1 semester only, and I’ve benefited so much from what I’ve already done. In fact, very few of my friends ended up with the same qualification they set out to achieve. .
Transgenderism
My wife has a friendship ring that come straight from a heart of prayer and straight from heaven as a gift from God. I have a home that technically I should never have received. I have a job that is all me. Are these things markers?
I'm so thankful we could manage on my Hubby's salary when our kids were small so I didn't have to contend with the constant juggling mums and dads have to do these days. I would have hated other people seeing/hearing their milestone achievements during those first precious years while I missed out. Unfortunately, most of today's young couples don't have a choice as two incomes are necessary just to keep their heads above water.
Thankfully with a little venting via my wife I was able to gain control of my emotions and the urge to eat. They stayed with me until my head hit the pillow last night but I was able pull back the reigns and avoid opening the refrigerator.
that we might actually put it to good use.
And now you want me one more time
I headed out to the dentist with my Lily Kay after school today and we were both almost blown down by the wind. I felt like March was blowing it's way right into February. I can't help getting excited about March because it is my little guys birthday. I need to start thinking about that too! Yikes! He wants me to bring Grave Digger the Monster Truck to his party. (Does he believe in me or what?)
the new lights are up and waiting
The first song is Hey Ya by Outkast. I love me some Outkast, “drip drip drop there goes an eargasm” hells to the yes boys. They are so funny, and damn talented. The only musical J will willingly watch is theirs. This song makes me want to boogie, and is easily singable, while on the radio in my car alone of course, not in front of anyone.
This month, our ladies are service industry detours representing the great shops at
8. Say: (As for) the death from which you flee, that will surely overtake you, then you shall be sent back to the Knower of the unseen and the seen, and He will inform you of that which you did.
Best of all, you can create endless stories with everything you create. Theoretically, boys don't do this as much as girls do. But Augie spends hours setting up and narrating fire scenarios, directing the firefighters (and the occasional grandma) to this floor of the hotel to lead out all the cooks or another floor to lead out the guests ("And tell them not to spend time looking for pets or purses or stuff!"). We usher imaginary fire victims onto waiting buses and drive them to the hospital or a shelter. Augie likes to take the ones who are okay directly to the fire station so they can begin training to be firefighters.
The Art Fair will take place in Memorial Park, 222 West Sierra Madre Blvd., Sierra Madre, on Saturday, May 5, from 9:30AM to 6:00PM and Sunday, May 6, from 9:30AM to 5:00PM and will feature works by artists and craftsmen in a wide variety of media, live music, food vendors, a children’s art project, and a silent auction. Proceeds from the Art Fair benefit the Sierra Madre Library. For more information, visit our website at www.sierramadrelibraryfriends.org or call 626 355-7186.
Here is Doris Day belting that little ditty out.
Letter will be sent to your mailbox. Visit all the locations for the anniversary event.
“We have a lot more important things to do,” says Chief Bruce Gates, “but these are things that are quality of life issues, community policing issues that a lot of people don’t want to see downtown.”
~A big, potted orchid (the perfect finishing touch!)
dash of pepper and salt to taste
Shoot me.
Goldy takes them all in thinking that her house will surely be safe since her husband is a cop but they are not even safe there. The house is almost burglarized but Golldy's son foils that attempt. Then another body is found.
she has changed!
glory to God” (Romans 4:20). Abraham had God’s Word as evidence and spoke in
Free Trade area – All barriers to the trade of goods and services among member countries are removed. In the theoretically ideal free trade area, no discriminatory tariffs, quotas, subsidies, or administrative impediments are allowed to distort trade between members.
This morning, I awoke at my customary 5:00am (which is 10am in the UK) and promptly turned on the TV to catch the Royal Wedding hoopla. After about 10 seconds of cringing at the U.S. commentators, I switched over to the BBC and from there, enjoyed a more sedate and dry perspective. One of my favorite moments was when Simon Schama (a brilliant historian and writer) commented that the Queen's cousins riding along in the little coaches (luxurious mini-buses) could be a team of footballers heading off to a match, to all appearances.
Why is it important to do this? Well, I think if you're going to assess a visual poet, you can assess him or her by the same values as you assess a post-Movement poet. They're not going to share very many values in common. Yet they would still both call themselves poets. It's also why there's really no such thing as 'just poetry'.
31. A Fine Balance - Rohinton Mistry
I just got back from a trip to Chicago, so I was going to post Sandburg's "Chicago," but then I stumbled upon this one and like it much better. Normally, you know, I'm not a big fan of free verse (or even blank verse, much of the time), but I like the ideas in this poem.
Jules hopped in next, with a really great card, as always, reminding us of Summer and lazy days watching cricket (and wondering how many grass stains there would be to remove from the 'whites' after the match!). Such a great image here and I always look for the heart on Jules' cards of course, this one was a tad sneaky to say the least - I found it though, can you? Jules has been uber busy this week so it's especially good of her to still come and have a swift go on the swings!
I mentioned to you before Christmas that I am helping my daughter renovate her first apartment. I have to tell you that I love a renovation... especially when it is a total make-over... The sound of the saws, the drills and the hammers is music to my ears; the smell of wet plaster and paint is like a sweet fragrance to me. I understand that for some, building is a chore and a drama that they would sooner live without - for me, it is pure pleasure.
Flatware is my Renaissance Reproduction pattern
That he’s breeding okapis.
“That’s sarcastic, isn’t it?”
In The Big Enchilada, we get an overview of his post secondary education. Two of the best film schools, nothing else. He helps out a friend in a congressional race in 1978, when he is twenty five, no further education is cited. I bold what might be a significant sentence.
Speakeasy Big Daddy 7
So, yeah....I was wrong. I DID get my netbook back and it does work (thankfully!). Though having it back hasn't helped me get back on track with blogging more regularly OR keeping up with the blogs that I read.
(Written on November 9, 2010)
And the myth that only Leftists "care"
My little turkeys got quite a few compliments on their shirts at the parade downtown. Here Jeff and Johnny are waiting for the parade to start. J had to be held up to see due to the crazed woman in front of us who brought a chair to sit in, but stood up and waved her hands every time a float came. She was trying to catch something, anything, free being thrown from the floats. Really, lady, I don't get it. You are grown, the whistles, candy, etc are for the kids. Whatever. I am fine with my little guys not blowing that crazy loud whistle all day or adding to their increasing sugar consumption.
Price: see amazon!
*He begins crying.*
AFP/Defense News, 04/23/2o12
*I know, I know, the "price" is that I'm being packaged and sold to advertisers (which, by the way, I can opt out of.). It's 2012, that ship has sailed my friend.
However, Chet failed to establish that the general public would assume a connection between him and KRAUSE PUBLICATIONS. Nor did Chet demonstrate that "he is publicly connected with the services in class 41, namely, 'entertainment services in the nature of competitions and awards in the field of cutlery.'"
The result was moist, not overly sweet, with a slightly citrusy taste and a suttle yet distinct fruitiness from the olive oil. It is what I consider a perfect breakfast cake, or fitting to eat with a cup of tea on a rainy day with a sweet, feverish bundle asleep in your arms.
So the country went mad, and now there is no stock left. Essentially, media hype created a marmite feeding frenzy because none of us want to be without it for three or four months. I checked, and I have half a 500g jar left, and I wanted to buy more – but by the time we went looking, at around seven last night, it was all gone.
Anyway, Hope is an excellent teacher, and I try to steal all of her ideas as often as possible. One of her gems is how she uses Lip Smackers. You can pick up these fragrant lip balms rather inexpensively and yet your little muskrats will go crazy when you pull one out. Hope rewards (and by default encourages) her students when they make good choices with a "Smelly." She just puts a dot of the lip balm on a well-behaving student's hand as an aromatic way to say, "Great job!" And I can tell you from experience with my 2nd graders, they LOVE to get a Smelly. Give it a try! Thanks, Hope!
The new ferry terminal in the B-Shed on Victoria Quay in the Fremantle port opened this morning and what a stunning addition to the port it is! Incorporated in the heritage shed are boldly coloured pods, historic photo glass window displays, mosaics in the toilets, and the Tasty Cafe straight at water’s edge.
2. Project Manager and Project Advisors
Steps to become a Real Estate Agent
The other night I was thinking about this and though necessary it isn't fun for me - or B.
And somewhere out there, there is someone who is interested in learning more about their friend the pimp's bad day.
“Dead. Dead dead. I did a scan. No accounts. Your money is no good here. Last call for alcohol. One bourbon, one scotch, one beer. You don't have to go home, but you can't stay here. Blinkity.”
so remove the light and white becomes grey.
-Sassy
Without you there’s nothing left to do…
OWS says the power and wealth of these elite REDS needs to be clipped and I AGREE! These elites have destroyed our economy beyond repair and they’ve destroyed our government too. Now they are in process of destroying our society so they can reshape it in THEIR OWN IMAGE! Don’t believe for a minute that these elites give one damned about your or your family or futures. THEY DON’T! They play you for THEIR benefit NOT yours!
According to the latest Social Weather Stations survey, President Aquino’s net satisfaction rating dropped from “very good” to “good.” Bad.
Remember to make today a better day!
Before we finished paying the vet bill, our other old friend, Sméagol developed an abscess on his tail which had to be lanced.
Well this has turned into a mini novel. Hope you have a good rest of your day.
My husband reads my blog. It was never a secret, he's known about it from the beginning. He never really discussed it to much with me. In the beginning, one of my first personal posts was about an old friend of mine. He came into the bedroom, long after I had gone to bed, and woke me up to 'discuss' it. That 'gesture' was not received well...I shot him down, told him to leave, I was sleeping and had no interest in talking with him about it. The next day, I brought it up, he didn't want to talk about it...From that point on, he never really said much. I think there was a lot about me that he was surprised about...and some of that I think is my fault, but some of it is his too. These last few months have been hard on him. Reading my true feelings has not been easy for him...he said at one point he was going to stop reading...he didn't, and it hurts him to know how I feel. For that, I have no apologies...that's all on him. These are my feelings, and I am working through them the best way I know how.
In her over-zealous defense of her colleague, Ms. Ramanan, entirely forgoes this conversation about men rights, and their being left ‘remedy-less’.
The cache was titled Too Many Signs, and the coordinates led us to a parking lot. Now, where were too many signs?
Not being that of a low paid, unskilled worker, I find it hard to believe that immigration can be that bad.
Another trick I learnt was how to give the truffles a crisp chocolate outer shell. When I made truffles at home, I dipped them in melted chocolate, and left them to set. But they set with the excess chocolate that ran around the bottom, and I also had a lot of trouble getting them off the plate afterwards! Obviously I should have put them onto greaseproof paper to set, which we did this time. But the other trick I learnt was that rather than dip the truffles in chocolate, put on some disposable rubber gloves and dip your hands in melted chocolate. Pick up each truffle and roll it gently in your hands to coat with chocolate. You can leave them to set and repeat the process up to three times, although we only did it once as we didn't have enough time to wait for three coats to dry.
as the last tones kissed and crashed together
Last night Gladys, our French Bulldog, died peacefully in her sleep from cancer. Regrettably we weren’t with her as we’re in Jacksonville FL for my mother-in-law’s funeral.
At first I wasn't sure which image I wanted to use on this week's sketch, but as I started flipping through my MFT sets, the card came together in my mind as soon as I saw Inspired by Spring. I just love the branch full of blooms.
Kids furniture always fascinates me. It somehow took me to my inner childhood fantasies. What's your childhood fantasy? Mine include a princess castle, some fairies, and a unicorn ;)
I shivered. The sun had disappeared for a moment. If we only stood in it for a moment, it should be okay, right?
These are lovely. Would certainly like to make them and add them to our nature table. . .
1 tsp garlic chili sauce
He said it with such urgency and repeated it a few times as if looking for reassurance.
Doesn't everyone have a handmade leather bed from Morocco?
Brian Worley, wedding planner for “Shedding for the Wedding” on the CW Television Network, showed KTLA viewers the dazzling custom napkin rings that were designed by Wildflower Linen specifically for Très Fabu Event's upcoming wedding for clients Kasie and Thomas, along with the fabulous mother of the bride, Jann Bytheway. The wedding will feature an array of blues, platinums, blacks, and whites, and the napkin rings will definitely add a sparkle to each table!
Who knows? A lucky typo may even become accepted usage, say, “ants suit” for an ill-fitting garment that causes skin irritation. But enough about typos and on to their cousin, the misquotation. I am the victim of a particularly irritating one. In a 1971 review of a play called Abelard and Heloise, I wrote, “Diana Rigg, the Heloise, is built, alas, like a brick basilica with inadequate flying buttresses.” This in reference to a nude scene revealing her as somewhat deficient in the chest department.
It was very easy and simple than what I've imagined it to be.
I was in a festive mood and piped my icing on and used one of my extra limes to make small quarter-slices to place on top.
So this is my still life setup area by the one window in my 11' x 11' studio. I think I have South light - not sure. Afternoon light whatever that is?
HAMMOND GW, CHEANG M. Absenteeism among hospital staff during an influenza epidemic: implications for immunoprophylaxis. Can Med Assoc J 1984; 131: 449-452.
Time for a rest perhaps? Never. Believe it or not there are still countries he hasn't DJ’d or dug for records in, still sounds he hasn't experienced, and still so many great records to make. Onwards and upwards my friends,onwards and upwards...
I like Texas, and I'm not here to dog on my home, but it's not that pretty here. It's flat and I love hills and mountains. It's dry and I love rivers and oceans. It's nice in an average sort of way. I want to live here. I love people more than I love pretty places and the people I love are here. But sometimes I need to see beautiful places in the world, to be reminded of God in the way that is most satisfying to me. I miss that now that I’m home. It might be what I miss most.
...but others are just waiting for a good hot day to really open up. Lush, extravagant, decadent...I am mad about peonies and have had a hard time waiting this year for them to bloom!
Before ending I want to stress that the sole reason for my avoiding alcohol has been that whilst I enjoy it at the time, it seems to make my anxiety symptoms worse, particularly the following day. It is difficult to know the reasons for this; they may be purely psychological, or alternatively the alcohol may be interacting with my medication. On the other hand it could just be down to the simple fact that alcohol is a central nervous system depressant, and can enhance any feelings of depression. Whatever the reason. I don't want to turn into some rabid anti-alcohol crusader, and as I start to gradually feel better, and slowly cut back on the medication. I will start to gradually re-introduce my system to some proper beers!
Without darkness, we cannot know the light. True in games as it is in life. Without the chance of failure, there is no chance of success. Failure, in current WoW, has been twisted beyond recognition as the game becomes an unsophisticated to-do list: failure to cap Valor Points, failure to level an alt quickly, failure to receive loot from a PuG clear. And it can all simply be remedied by logging on another day. The rewards from Valor Points will improve, alts will plow through a few more identical quests, raid content will be nerfed. There is no constructive and useful failure that pushes you to think about how you play the game. And the hidden casualty is even more painful: there are no moments of true victory.
I can't bend down too low for too long. Squatting is out of the question. I get hubby and Jake the Snake to haul one box downstairs to work on as "down time"...after all we now have a zillion television channels to choose from and dvr (I can't use it until I read that part of the big fat instruction booklet-MY RULE!)
This is the kind of serious YA that I could totally hand to an adult reader and not get "the weird look" (and, I WILL be handing this to a few of my adult library patrons who like The Hunger Games).
"Convict #97"
Dear Friends and Allies,
I was thoroughly satisfied, not to mention hopeful for some drama and consequence in my own sedentary existence. But now it was time to get back to my research. I dug into Ms. Ozaki’s enticing collection of stories—and I encourage you to do the same!
Actually, he doesn't have a name.
Here is the photo from the night of 25.2.12, looking west over Jerusalem. Just above the moon to the left is a planet. When I first saw it I purposely tried to incude it in the shot as I thought it was a bright star. But in fact, alerted by the one of the comments under my post, it is a planet.
Happy Monday Girls!
“Policy is policy. Politics is politics. First you figure out what you want — in my case, I want clean energy, dense land use, and economic justice — and then you take every chance to make progress toward those goals. Meanwhile, you wage political war with the tools of politics: money, message, organization, solidarity, and a healthy dose of ruthless opportunism. Policy concessions aren’t just a poor weapon in that war; they are no weapon at all.”
Gabe and Lizzy — Bill, Nora and then Lena — Bud and Ida — Bruce and Barb
the way it’s always been.
Naturally her first reactions were of amused surprise, then borderline hysterical shock. Fortunately, the List was long enough that she had recovered her poise before the end was reached.
Tall-guy: “Dink is great around people. He’s never bit anybody. He just has to assert himself with other dogs because he’s a born alpha.”
Bake 12 to 14 minutes or until centers are set. Cool for 1 minute on cookie sheet. Transfer cookies to wire rack and let cool.
Not many people have spotted the original inspiration, so respect is due.
Since my dad left the rest of the Bailey's, I decided it'd be a good idea to try a little in my coffee the next day. Not bad! My favorite use for Bailey's is to mix it with butterscotch schnapps, so that may have to go on the grocery list...but I've gotten off topic.
I had tried to hand him my Barry Canoga, Photographer business card one time. It was after he had emerged from the shower, wrapped in a white towel, water dripping off his tanned body. But he dismissed me. And told me, without saying so, to get lost.
Since when did we reach the point that searching for so many people has become Googling? Just like Kleenex for tissue.
There were several further unpleasant surprises waiting at the finale though. The yarn was dyed in such a way that it produced hideous striping in dark and light green. The poor thing wasn't off the needles for ten minutes before it found itself floating in a pre-soak so I could overdye it. And--wait for it--the dyer hadn't bothered to fix the color, so her greens bled copiously into the presoak water. No amount of rinsing would remove the excess dye, which had the temerity to turn my fingernails green when I flipped the shawl over.
What’s going on here? What have these people done? What’s makes them any different from Israel? Doesn’t this make God seem like no more than a petty, tribal deity? How are such actions compatible with the biblical message of undying faithfulness, love, and compassion? All valid questions.
Once upon a time I worked downtown at the Omni. Half of this building is devoted to a hotel, half to offices, and it is bisected by a lofty, sixteen-story, 200-foot tall, steel-and-glass atrium. Since I was raised in small towns and am an easily amused bumpkin I actually got a thrill every time I had to ride up or down in one of the glass-walled elevators there.
Actually you don’t reap what you sow, you reap the fruits of what you sow.
Twin miniature donkeys that is!!! ;)
Also, during our extended hours 6 PM to 8 PM (Wed through Fri), you can get $3 pints, and if you need a snack, we have mini pizzas, potato chips and popcorn.
Margaret said that after hearing the Star’s explanations last month, she had verbally told ABC secretariat staff to release the ABC 2011 report, which they did using the set previously approved by the ABC Board. It did not have the Star’s figures as these were then awaiting full Board approval.
I recently had the privilege to perform the release management duties for Apache Karaf's first release as a top level project. The process went relatively smooth considering we were creating our release guide as we worked. So for this blog entry I'd like to talk a little about the experience in the hopes that other release managers may gain some more insight into the goings on in Apache projects.
A coelacanth is a so called living fossil, a big old fish that was first found alive in 1938. The 3D film reference came from, as I remember, a season of 1950’s films I’d seen at the Plymouth Arts Centre. In those days it was the card glasses with a green lens in one eye and a red lens in the other. I was a big movie fan in those days, some Saturdays I’d go to a show in the afternoon and another in the evening.
When I started losing weight, it was as if something just clicked. I was serious. I ran a sucky 10K race, and was overweight. I felt and looked like I was wearing a fat suit. Instead, I was just fat. So I set out a new exercise plan, and decided to watch my diet more closely.
Can't believe that fully functional Pet Covers come in suede? Well, it's true, and they make wonderful additions to any pet owner's home. Pet Covers in luxurious quilted suede feel great for both humans and pets to relax on. Available in subtle, versatile shades like taupe, they'll compliment the décor of practically any style of décor. Available in attractive styling, so you can protect your furniture without sacrificing the look you want!
With their own corn, and a pregnant sow’s entrails.
She was colored with Copics....her skirt and shoes got a coat of star dust stickles. The outside of the picture frame was coated with Diamond Glaze for some shine!
My mom sent me this video which might be helpful for my friends who are having babies.
Verily, that purity which arises from knowledge, is regarded as the best.
I found myself pausing to reflect whether there is something of the emperor’s new clothes syndrome going on here. Are those of us deeply engaged with books and publishing so blinded by our beliefs and our self-belief that we can’t risk seeing ourselves through the eyes of others? The comment thread reveals both an unwillingness to tolerate criticism and some of the unwritten expectations we have of the way in which people comment on blogposts and in discussion fora. This is not the first time I have observed a dissenting voice raising the ire of a committed and converted community of followers and in doing so often terminating a discussion.
whose nightmares come in the daytime,
The Ludwig family has always been described as a fundamentalist religious sect. To read the media, you would think their religious views are somewhat freakish. I was surprised at how “normal” their views were. Yes, they are rather conservative. At the same time, their views seemed relatively mainstream, in an odd sort of way. I got the sense that they had a strong sense of social justice, and that this was informed by their beliefs. It was also part of the driving force for their activism. When Wiebo was asked about obeying the law, or something like that, he commented about bad laws. He described the people who hid Jews in Holland during WWII, and how they were breaking the law, but that it was the right thing to do. That analogy helped me to understand how a man born during WWII in Holland would have such strong views. When I listened to him and his family speak of their faith, I came to admire their strength. I can’t even imagine what it might be like to live their lives in the past 15 or so years, and yet, they maintain their faith and strength of character. They were surprisingly free of bitterness under the circumstances.
He started out as such a radical unionist firebrand and Marxist agitator that he was often jailed for his pains. But as he matured he moved towards somewhat more moderate politics which saw him win power by political rather than by revolutionary means. Modern day Leftists seem to be the same. The young go out demonstrating against globalization and the like while older Leftists exert their efforts within the framework of conventional democratic politics -- via the major Leftist political parties.
OPE zine is one of the most expensive zines available today, at $4 per issue ($24 for a one year subscription). Subscribers consist of fans of the author's work and friends who feel sorry for Kurt, who hasn't held a paying job in over four years.
#1 was chosen for the month of January which should be my Snowmen quilt. It is second in the list of needing the most done to get it completed, and since I have a couple of other commitments for the month I am going to trade it for #6 - my Valentine Heart quilt. Check out Patchwork Times to see what others have gotten done.
If this book were a beverage, it would be: a full-bodied oolong tea to be sipped slowly.
1 small stalk broccoli
Tangerines off the tree and some kind of passion fruit I have eaten here. A bunch of grapes I have consumed from guys crushing grapes into pulp and bumped into Ziggy. He has been walking. Where I have been stumbling he has worn the correct footwear and hitched where I waited for a bus. Oh how stupid you are.
I was going to write something light-hearted tonight, until I saw an Associated Press story reported by WCCO news here in the Twin Cities. The article is linked here. Autism Fears, Measles Spike Among Minn. Somalis
“If you want a place that’s peaceful and quiet, move out closer to the country,” Schneider said. “If you are looking for being in an active neighborhood with lots of street life, places to walk around, and close to downtown then move to the Whiteaker.”
Afterwards, he and his boys decide to celebrate with some early morning snacks. So they head over to the local convenience store and Jeremy goes in to snag some food. An overworked Latino man and his teenage son are cleaning the place when a trio of very bad looking men enter. There’s Boyd, Sean, and Neil Hagan, the leader (a man with Arayan tattoos bursting out of his suit).
Hi everyone. Just a quick note to say that my blog is going to be a little bit quiet for a couple of weeks because I’m getting married, so am taking a bit of time off but I will be back raring to go very soon but before I go a few of the Make The Day Special girls have planned a mini blog hop for you. We all thought it would be fun to showcase a particular set of stamps and see all of the different ideas we would come up with using the same stamps.
If you’re a fan of fairytales, I know I certainly am, then you will devour this within a couple of days very easily. It’s down to Ivey’s beautiful yet haunting prose that really brings the snow child herself to life. I adored the Alaskan 1920s setting and this seemed to come very naturally to Ivey, an Alaskan herself. Everything about it felt utterly authentic and completely effortless, and I couldn’t help but feel so much compassion for this heartbroken couple who have uprooted their whole lives to come to this desolate, unforgiving and extremely cold land. With their still-born child weighing heavily on their marriage, you can’t help but feel as though Alaska is their last chance at living some sort of a happy life together, and you will root for them every step of the way.
3. Finding the problem is the hardest part.
*If you have not received first Holy Communion, hold your arms across your chest when you approach the priest to receive a blessing.
After that, I never admitted to liking anything that wasn’t Cool Guy Approved – The Mighty Lemondrops, The Violent Femmes, Kate Bush, They Might Be Giants, Blondie, The Cure, Uncle Tupelo, The Pixies, The Replacements. I genuinely liked and like these artists.
I'm definitely not leaving A Small Tribe behind. I have a beautiful family who takes my breath away on a daily basis. I still want to have this record of our lives... and I have all of you, my incredible friends, that I want to continue sharing with. So I just wanted to let you know where I am part of the time... please feel free to visit and put your feet up (or in some running shoes if the feeling grabs you)... I always love visitors :)
The photo illustrates a piece of cast iron gate valve that is eight inches. What makes this significant is that it was rigged up to use on a six inch cast iron stand pipe and a six inch non standard for irrigation sewer pipe. For the last four year almost five it has leaked like a sieve! Each time the fields were watered the waste pouring out the non matched up orifice would make a mini lake at the base do an earth dam reservoir. Just ponder that for a moment will you? What might be wrong with a small lake at the base of a tamped earth dam? Why yes, it could erode and eventually compromise the entire structure!
While this is price bearish for crude oil today and in the immediate term, these measures are being implemented with the intent to stave off significantly higher prices in the near- and medium-term. The fact that the IEA had to go to these lengths in the second year of an expanding business cycle says something very bullish about crude oil prices in the medium-and long-term. The global economy is up against a wall in terms of receiving additional oil supplies to meet demand. Additional demand or supply disruption would have a massively bullish impact on prices. After all, releasing emergency inventories is a last resort.
So anyway, I told her I was nervous since this was my first NST and she nicely explained what they were looking for--they'd find the baseline heart rate and then watch to see that it accelerated by 15 beats twice in 15 minutes. This indicates that the baby is moving and shaking in there, and that the heart is keeping up. She said that they keep people on the monitor for 30 minutes or longer if necessary, and that since my baby is so young, it might take longer. (I'm just at 30 weeks and these tests normally start at 32 weeks, but since my loss occurred at 34 weeks, my doctors want to start gathering data on the Deuce now.) She said that she'd keep an eye on things from the nurse's station and she'd come back and have me move around if necessary. Then she left.
The original recipe calls for an entire jigger of absinthe. I just couldn't do it. The point was made just as thoroughly with half the amount. This cocktail smelled and tasted heavily of absinthe. None of the other ingredients could puncture this hard steel casing of absinthe. I wasn't surprised. But sometimes a drink can provide a cocktail geek like me with something beyond the mere exploration of flavors. It's hard to admit, but I have actually been looking forward to this drink for quite some time. For the nature of experimentation, I assure you. Before Firpo's Balloon, I had never tasted, or for that matter ever heard of, a cocktail that included egg white, and that did not also include some form of citrus. Egg white cocktails almost always call for some form of lemon or lime juice because the acids help stabilize that beautiful characteristic foam. I was very curious to see what happened when egg white was called for in a cocktail consisted entirely of, well, alcohol. Result: given the small amount of egg white, only a very little foam appeared. In contrast to most egg white drinks, the Balloon's texture was not velvety--in fact, it was quite grainy. And thus, our ultimate conclusions were: it tasted one-dimensional and the mouth feel made it undrinkable. Alas, a sink donation.
Solace 2 fathers/mothers we’ll stand 2gether, we’ll all start anew
Basically it goes something like this: some songs sound better when you light a candle, lay on the ground and turn up the tunes. Well, today while searching for the soundtrack of "Nights at Rodanthe" (yes, it's fantastic and yes you should buy it) I found this gem.
Dipping moon and drunk as a new dropped calf,
“Oh no…don’t even think about following me!” He protested as he began backing away.
Then, on day 8, I did a new set of benchmarks. I was blown away. Everything – and I mean everything – had improved at least 100%. Some things were performing 3 or 4 times better than they had before. Not only did World of Warcraft run now, it ran at a blistering 60 frames per second.
But that story is not over. Selvach Santhiran, the witness, was allegedly beaten viciously in front of his family by a bunch of policemen before being taken away.
Ryan Mallen (again) for making multiple PBR / Beer runs throughout the night!
Many of them later abandoned their projects and run away without paying back the debt borrowed from Vietnamese Banks, especially Vietnam Agribank.
When he was touring, Carman (full name: Carman Domenic Licciardello) was a charismatic sight to behold. His concerts were incredible experiences; more like a rock-n-roll, Billy Graham Crusade than a church event. After each concert, hundreds of people would work their way down to the counseling area to accept Christ; often as many as 5,000 in an evening. Amazingly, admission to a Carman concert was usually free and an offering generally was taken.
“Well, it’s definitely not a Snuggie, so thank you.”
We have already mentioned geographical consolidation, which is, of course, essentially a euphemism for ethno-religious cleansing. In this context, we discussed the relative ease of pushing Muslims from Zone C to Zone B, and the relative difficulty of pushing them from Zone B to Zone A. This objective would probably have to be achieved, at least in some cases, by car bombings, as Zone B Muslim areas are, by definition, too large and robust for isolated attacks on single targets to be able to uproot them with consistency. Of course, these attacks would have the potential to kill large numbers of Muslim passers-by if conducted without warnings. This large-scale killing is not one of the core objectives (except in the hypothetical case in which it takes place as a retaliatory attack), so we assume that British paramilitaries will try and avoid it at the stages of the conflict we are describing here. Nonetheless, this objective and the geographical consolidation objective may end up dovetailing with the use of car bombs against Muslim residential or commercial areas either at night or with warnings to limit casualties.
Just Simply...... a Grab Bag filled with general use themed goodies easy to use for those everyday moments we so want to remember.
Toss in whatever extras you want...a couple quartered onions, garlic, pepper, celery stalks, seasonings, etc. Experiment with whatever you have on hand! If you have nothing on hand...who cares? You can always season it later. A great tip is adding about a tablespoon of vinegar or other acidic liquid like lemon juice. Doing this will help leach the calcium from the bones.
11.
At noon-ish, Andrea, a FRG (um, not sure what it stands for, but it's some family organization inside of the army) leader in Andrea's group, and I went to Sam's Club to buy some food/water/soda's for their sale tomorrow. I guess it's Military Appreciation days at Ft. Bliss (or something like that), and her FRG group is selling food to raise money. It was fun to tag along. I'd only been to Sam's Club once before, I think. With my sister-in-law. Pretty cool store, I have to say :)
“It’s a bit mucky out there tonight,” Hood mumbled with his pipe between his teeth.
Rats –Don’t Let Go –German pic sleeve
Fresh basil, if desired. Ande isn't a big fan of basil, so I left this out.
Radiant warmers are frequently used in delivery rooms and neonatal care units when open access and external heat are simultaneously required.
Remove broth and put in saucepan.
1 sickly
The Beer: Papa Louie's is the name of the beer that Ptacek has been working on for the last couple of years and plans to offer at Green Room Burgers & Beer. He says that it's essentially a 60/- Scottish Ale, a style he fell in love with while taking the BJCP exam a few years ago. Michael says that while he loves all beer, his heart belongs to session beers with subtle, complex flavors. "Papa Louis is my grandfather's name. He is 100% Czech, so I will be using Bohemian Pilsner malt, Saaz hops, and attempt a soft water profile similar to what Czech Pilsner is brewed with. 60/- does not travel well, so my brewing ambition is to produce enough for my restaurant, and that's about it."
— Avoid undercover or other surreptitious methods of gathering information except when traditional open methods will not yield information vital to the public. Use of such methods should be explained as part of the story
ME: Are you fucking kidding me?
Conversely, in a terrible market, you can have the best product in the world and an absolutely killer team, and it doesn't matter -- you're going to fail.
i) everytime a new hi rise appears in the neighbourhood
Not only do we like Chick-fil-A... who doesn't??... but you can depend on the fact that they are in a nice, safe area. This is especially important in Louisiana. Before I learned the Chick-fil-A trick, I accidentally stopped at some very questionable spots by myself- not good! Also, when I do happen to be traveling without Gordon, I can depend on excellent customer service at Chick-fil-A. Having someone come offer to take my tray to the table or bring me an extra napkin or a refill makes a HUGE difference on such a long day! The clientele is also much nicer... nothing like sitting next to a creepy looking guy when you KNOW that it is obvious you are traveling alone with two small girls.
Presenting the Meg-a-Readers Blog Hop!
Personally, I think you know you’ve found a ripper of a read when you can quote that first line (or even the first paragraph!) back to people. They’re the kinds of lines that people will remember through the ages, that your readers will use as a way of judging if they want to turn the page, or put your book back on the shelf.
Extras The same Basic Grey paper coloured in Marsh Green and Epiphany'd with Round 14
That did result – I think – who am I to truly know? – in my being able to write pretty much anything in any style under pressure. And, because I also interviewed people for magazines, I knew the difference between writing for the human voice in vision and out of vision; and writing for different types of print.
The wise man saw the young and simple straying into the house of the strange woman. The house seemed so completely different from what he knew it to be that he desired to shed a light upon it, that the young man might not sin in the dark, but might understand the nature of his deeds. The wise man looked abroad and he saw but one lamp suitable to his purpose; it was named “At the last;” so snatching this he held it up in the midst of the strange woman’s den of infamy, and everything was changed from what it had been before: the truth had come to light and the deceptive had vanished. The young man dreamed of pleasure, in wanton dalliance he hoped to find delight; but when the lamp of “At the last” began to shine, he saw rottenness in his bones, filthiness in his flesh, pains and griefs and sorrows as the necessary consequence of sin, and wisely guided, wisely taught, the simple-minded started back and listened to the admonitions of the teacher, “Come not nigh the door of her house, for her gates lead down to the chambers of death.”
Anyway Brick Store had a nice somewhat rustic decor and was packed. We eventually made our way to a table after posting up at the bar. The wife and I both ordered a Cheeseburger and it was fantastic. The beer menus have some kind of old school leather covers, very nice. And the selection is AWESOME, with some cellared rare Belgian beer to boot. Combined with the food, I'll go on and say this is the best beer bar/restaurant I've been to (at least before I made it to Toronto). At this point, I'll just post my notes with the beers I tried and whatnot. Consider this a Behind-the-Scenes look at how I go about reviewing beer in real life. You can thank the baby for the extra notes.
And now it’s Twitter and their offer to censor tweets depending on what country you live in. They claim that there are historical and cultural reasons for supporting this censorship, but I don’t buy it. I have never minded hate centered speech because it informs me of exactly where these crazy birds are! Driving anything underground just makes it more appealing to some.
HE WAS A MIDGET. HE WAS A VERY, VERY, SHORT MAN.
“Yes,” Kenny encouraged, “I seem to recall that.”
Physics Lab 1:00 – 3:50 pm
pasta
Howdy all
April gets two glasses out of the cabinet and places them on the counter.
As I mentioned, I am a Lakers fan, but I promise you I will be fair in this assessment. The Lakers filled their biggest void in letting go of Lakers legend Derek Fisher for the youth of Ramon Sessions. Honestly with the dominance of the lead guards in the west, they needed someone who could compete at the position to offset the fact that they are going to see either, Parker, Westbrook or Paul in the west and possibly D. Rose in the east, if they make it that far. Sessions also makes their second team better because Blake can play his role as an effective back up, not a starter. Bynum must NOT take games off and Gasol needs to get used to some pounding in the playoffs for them to make a run. No need to say much about Kobe because we know what we will get from him after 16 years. The Nuggets will not lay down easily and if the Lakers don’t take them out early, they will find themselves in a dog fight that Kobe and his legs do not want.
Link back to the blogger who presented the award to you.
The boys are getting used to this routine and it is especially good
“Prepare for the worst and hope for the best?” Tanner half asked, half stated.
Hollywood turned it into a movie in 2008, written and directed by another great artist: Frank Miller (300 and Sin City).
offensive line quickly, displaying great acceleration through the hole. While he’ll need to refine his hand use here and develop better
Jean Shinoda Bolen, M.D. in Urgent Message from Mother: Gather the Women, Save the World
‘This can’t happen to my Mum’
Dinner: No idea.
She just goes stumbling through her memories
When: Friday, May 15th, at 9:30 am
I would like to take a close look at the word “often” used here in this verse. The Greek word for “often” used here is Hosakis. It is a relative adverb. It is referring to the manner in which they were partaking, not the frequency. This is clearly evident if you back up a few verses, you’ll see that Paul is reprimanding the church at Corinth for abusing the Lord’s Supper.
“This is my home, my town. We can’t live like this,” Sagbo said.
“Don’t know… you considering being reborn?”
"He has always talked about how growing up in this place has shaped his character," Mrs. Obama said. "There is a special spirit here, a spirit of openness and tolerance."
2-3 tablespoons massage oil (such as sunflower, jojoba, olive or apricot kernel oil)
The victims are betrayed and the killers rewarded.
About an hour after Toby was born, our nurse brought us to the maternity ward, where we would be staying for two nights. In New York City hospitals, you typically share a room with another new mom. (Is that true for other cities, too?) It's totally fine, though, because a curtain goes around your half of the room for privacy, so you feel surprisingly separate; and it's also nice to have another mom around to talk to. (Private rooms were also available, but they cost a whopping $900 to $1100 per night! Yowza.)
So then Megan Fox Lite goes and sees her dad James Remar (seriously, what’s up with all the Dexter characters?), who tells her that she had a baby brother all along who died in the womb, who they called Jumby…because that’s a logical thing to nickname a baby before it’s born, right? What is that? A new Teletubbies character? Gumby’s half-retarded brother?
1108 ***D-IV/12/1991. “The Constitution in the Twenty-first Century.” Centennial Lecture Series, Lenoir-Rhyne College, Hickory, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item B-6, above, pp. 228-38, 449-54 (1995).)
Born: at Pierce, Nebraska
The leaves were cut from Mothers Day Bouquet cart and cut in a variation of green printed papers from my stash, and inked with brown and green Distress Inks. I also fit in a few MS punch leaves as well. I covered and sprayed different spots of these with gold and white Perfect Pearls for a finishing touch...well, that and added orange brown gems as berries.
I noted that one seldom sees her work in galleries to which she responded, “Apart from contacts with a limited number of galleries, my main outlet has been my website.”
In my world view, this is not valid. The gods, my gods, all gods, are eternal. They are whole unto themselves and rely on the mortal realm for nothing. Humanity has no power over the gods. None. A human soul cannot reach the same power/existence as the gods. Though that is not to say that humanity has no power or is not worthy of attention.
But the best move Bennett made was to hire Nicholas Meyer to write the script. I will concede it is the most literate and well crafted of the franchise. I will get more into the contrasting story themes and literarily allusions as I dissect the film below.
“Shouldn’t they just chase out the fujoshi? Is all men that bad?”
"What are you talking about?"
The Beatles--Two of Us
Students in JOMC 457, Advanced Editing, are writing guest posts for this blog this semester. This is the 10th of those posts. Miranda Murray is a junior majoring in editing and graphic design at UNC-Chapel Hill. She will work for Media General in Richmond, Va., this summer.
There were, of course, consequences for both men:
Other than messing on with my blog I’ve been researching female suffrage campaigners in the North East. Fascinating stuff. Looking at the role of women during the 1848 mining strike, women involved with Chartism and the campaign for female suffrage. I’ve added the book I’m currently reading on the subject on my suggested reading page. Well worth a look!
203 what is and what should never be
Meditations on the Life of Adoniram Judson
That night, seated in the Ramallah studio a few minutes drive north of here, her hair uncovered in Western, non-Islamic style and dressed fashionably, she read from the prepared script about a terrorist outrage (trust us on this: the PA’s script writers did not call it a terrorist outrage) that had paralyzed and shocked nearby Jerusalem some hours earlier the
Well, it’s gotten warm enough that the Puncture Vine (i.e. Goat Head weed) has germinated out in our perennial garden. I knew it was out there because the dogs kept getting into it, and I kept getting stabbed when I was planting the strawberries. Well, boy do we have it. Holy Ground Cover Batman. It’s an annual, and easy to kill with a rake or a hoe when it is small. I evidently chose a former bed of it to plant the strawberries in. I hope it all germinates this year and we can be done with it. We’re certainly not going to allow any of it to go to seed. I remember this stuff from California and Arizona, where it will go right through a bike tire, or a flip flop. Ouch.
To peel him off of me, I had to promise he could come back when I’d be better prepared to carve out a good eighth of my waking hours to learn about the advantages of Guardian Gutters (or perhaps it was Gutter Guardians). Now, only hours from the appointed time, I was going to back out.
It may be the last day of April, but that doesn’t mean that backpacks and school supplies are not needed in shelters or organizations that service homeless families!
and took a
Isn't this image just sooooooo CUTE??? This image's name is Millie's Flowers , you can pick that up along with this darling Mother's Day Sentiment at Inky Antics :)
Japan/Gaming/Nerd Convention this weekend,
by all means, no problem whatsoever !
"What the pope said (in 2006) about the Prophet Mohammed is untrue. Islam did not spread through the power of sword. It's a religion of tolerance and faith," Hussein said.
... to be greeted by this performance:
-Tips for editing your photos in Aperture
Her doctor explained to us that medically she was a miracle, but it was the technical aspect of her tiny size that got her in the end. Her tiny veins were as thin as tissue paper and the fluids that she was being given leaked out of her veins. This fluid then pooled around her heart. Eventually her heart could not pump and that is when she went into distress. This distress caused the blood vessels in her lungs to burst and we were told the same probably happened in her brain. She was just so small her body could not handle that type of stress. We could not be more proud of our little girl. She fought so hard to live and never once gave up.
I got him a new wallet, dress socks (I'm sure he really wanted those) which I took off the tag for and instead made my own from kraft paper, a tie from tieobsessed on Etsy which was beautiful, and I crocheted him a laptop case. Candy and baked goods were also a part of this.
There was my cabinet, turned on its side with my husband bent over it, covered in paint dust. He looked up at me and grinned with his excitement. I stood there stunned, absolutely stunned. It was like coming home to a room whose walls had been a familiar white to find them painted purple. I couldn’t speak. All I could do was stare.
It’s time for demonstration by Ms. Eva with the model of the dae--- Applying moisture cream with certain techniques, allowing the skin to absorb and finally measuring the moisture level. The effect can be immediately seen! Very miraculous :)
I'm vaguely aware that yes, I had a life before the kitchen, and it was full of all sorts of people, and experiences, and jobs, and friends. I just don't remember it. I try to--there was a lot of life there. But all I can see is hazy memories, people I don't know anymore, and what seems like wasted time. And what about you?
The next night we kissed - I'm going to say 'under the moonlight' because that sounds much nicer than 'in the smoky corner of a busy pub'. And that was the beginning of a very happy romance:
But is the commander-in- chief saying no one would be spared except himself? At the core of this horrendous heist is the violation of budget management for which the President carries the responsibility. Any President who says he is not aware of the theft of N3trillion Naira for an item for which only N245 Billion was budgeted is not fit to hold office. That the President presented a supplementary budget in May, 2011 without asking for more money on subsidy is clear evidence that he cannot say he was not in the know of over 1100% fiscal roguery on the budgeted sum and this is a clear breach of his oath of office. In this regard, we agree with the House recommendation of the need for the criminalisation of budget overspend but we demand that it should not be in the future but to start now with this subsidy scam. The constitution is clear on this breach.
While most of the country runs on Daylight Saving Time today, with the exception of Hawaii, a state with nearly equal day length year-round, and Arizona, which refuses to adopt it, things weren’t always this uniform.
Thank you, friend, for raining on my parade and helping me laugh about it.
Let go of judgements especially on yourself. You are a spirit being having a human being experience. Allow yourself to understand this and appreciate all this entails. Striving constantly for spiritual perfection is exhausting and stops you from being true to yourself. It creates doing rather than being.
Please consider donating something to those in need during the holiday. If you do, let us know what you did so we can share ideas. And tell us if you have some ideas we could do to help homeless families not just at the holiday time but anytime of the year.
Now, if you knew me, you would know that I don't sew. Dropped out of sewing classes not once, but twice! Just too tedious to my liking.
Inspector
The role of Chief Brody was initially offered to Robert Duvall, but he was only interested in playing the “Quint” character.
Pretty good, eh? Only one crafty photo in the bunch! Hope you're having a nice summer too.
And really? A commercial where a lazy ass man sleeps in a lounge chair while his wife washes the windows? Who runs this ad agency? Mr. Cleaver?
someone who loves my kids as if they were his own
Chilli powder, 1 table spoons, more if you want it to be spicier!
NIC CAGE: Look, I know this is going to sound crazy, but I saw our future… or our past… or a sort of version… I don’t know, there was Don Cheadle, but that isn’t important! But there was a house and babies and we weren’t exactly happy but neither of us was ALONE AT CHRISTMAS!
Sadako: "Fellow liberal arts student facing student loans, eh?"
performances with an
story as a young girl and ends it as an adult. I wrote with readers in mind and hope they will appreciate my carefully worked prose and be able to identify with the universal truths and experiences I was trying to set down within this family saga.
So here are the pics... I was so excited that I took over 40 pictures!
Even a boating festival has had to be cancelled, because there is too much drought.
It is better to be violent, if there is violence in our hearts, than to put on the cloak of nonviolence to cover impotence.
- Fresh honeydew melons $2.96 each (Mexico or Guatemala)
Isn’t that what matters to us most? Feeling loved? Cared for? Asked about and remembered?
And that’s the secret to their success, if we don’t kill off their creative play before they get to learn from it.
Book 3 begins with them arriving in their “Utopia.” Yes, there’s more about the creatures, I am sure. They have to negotiate and begin to rebuild something resembling a normal life. It is, quite literally, a whole new world.
Hardy har har. I've heard the following many times, and now I'm yet another to testify that it's true: ofen an agent does not sell the first book of an author he or she represents. So it was with me.
If you were to walk by on the sidewalk outside her townhouse,
Pest Control Technology
Of memory filled with dreamed intuitional force
The last thing Sean O’Brien wants is to investigate a sixty-three-year-old murder. But Billy Lawson’s granddaughter and his cancer-stricken widow are desperate for closure. For O’Brien to bring it to them he has to pry the lid off a secret connected to the Manhattan Project. It’s a secret that got Billy Lawson killed, and O’Brien soon learns the old murder and his new discovery at the bottom of the sea are inextricably knotted. O’Brien’s thrust into a world where nothing is as it appears and everything is riding on a secret that was buried with Billy Lawson.
In this regard, I support the move by the Ministry of Education to introduce renewable permits for teachers. What should be guarded against, however, is not letting the whole exercise degenerate into a gravy train for rent seeking by government officials by introducing systems and transparency. For example, a score card system that shows what rating a teacher has gotten versus objective parameters such as KCPE & KCSE average passes for students should be introduced. This could reduce the case of envelopes changing hands at midnight.
LB was holding my hand the whole time and the ginormous grin never left her face. She asked me where the course went and I tried to explain, but I wasn't sure of the whole course. So I gave up and told her to follow everyone else. "But what if we're first?" she said. I smiled and pointed out the bicyclist who would be leading the pack. "What if we're faster than the guy on the bike??" she asked, 100% seriously. I laughed and told her that we'd just run.
“And I said, What shall I do, Lord? And the Lord said unto me, Arise, and go into Damascus; and there it shall be told thee of all things which are appointed for thee to do.”
Today I was at Sports Authority buying a bicycle, which I hope to ride for exercise and lose weight. I have a bad back because of spinal stenosis and arthritis, and can’t walk for exercise, so the idea is to bicycle instead. My theory is losing weight will help my back so I can do more, which is really a wish to be younger. We all want to turn the clock back. But, those delusional desires are so instructive.
Under the Afrikaners, the blacks enjoyed a standard of life far above that of any other African state. By any measure --infant mortality, literacy, life expectancy, you name it-- South African blacks were better off than their neighbors -- so much so that the latter began to leave their civil-war torn countries for peaceful South Africa.
Our new workshop will open for entries at noon on Saturday. As always, the details are here:
Whatever the outcome of this case, and whether or not the judge would throw out the case for anyone of the reasons described above, the purpose of this FBI publicity stunt was to score a point which may have a long-lasting subliminal effect on most people via the the following circular fallacy:
Cut oranges into halves.
I'm too drunk to fuck
The Big Sleep was one of those real revelations for me. I have a feeling that I’d always meant to read Chandler, but only got around to it in 2009 when I grabbed a fancy – but cheap – leather-bound edition of The Big Sleep from a sinking bookshop to take with me on a long flight to San Francisco. I was aware that San Francisco was a haunt of another of the noir greats, Dashiell Hammett, so it seemed like an appropriate choice.
We got some shopping done (jeans, a running belt, a wedding suit for Brian!) but didn’t spend too much. After all, we have a wedding to pay for and a fabulous trip to NY in two weeks!
The original idea was to blow it all up.
Recommendation - I would recommend this book for all middle school learners, but believe that a high school aged learner would benefit from such a book as well.
Some argued the wrens good qualities gave it special dispensation and, after all, this tendency to murder the young of others as they slept egg bound wasn't likely to disrupt the natural order in any meaningful way.
I opted not to add piping to the neckline, partly because I didn't have much polka dot fabric to spare. I added piping to the pockets which looks great (if I say so myself) and is a nice touch to mirror the collar fabric.
“He does not exist as a president except in the imagination of those who blindly support him. Whereas he is politically desired by a transient consensus, his legality is unresolved until a responsible court makes a determination. This is the essence of our crisis. Our nation exists in a state of non-authorized identity. Obama is just some guy calling himself a president and living in the White House without the confirmative authority to do so.”
Me: Is everything ok?!?
I've posted before about the fatuous and often bizarre language used by companies to describe what they do. The slogans and mission statements often use 'solutions' as a catch-all term, and tend to pomposity when describing the most mundane matters. I observed a cracker today, on a van belonging to a company I hadn't heard of before: ProLicht, with the trendy inter-capital. Their business, according to the statement on the van, is "turnkey solutions for national and international corporate brand programmes." No, I had no idea, either. So I looked them up. As you might expect from the name, they are a German company, and their business is making signs. So, "turnkey solutions for national and international corporate brand programmes" means "signage". Their website is a treasure trove of corporate bollocks-speak, often using those incomplete sentences. You know. Like this. To seem more important. Or something.
If I know you
April 21-26...Hold onto your hats during this whirlwind tour...we'll be making stops all over the country, with a quick jet over to Australia! Fun!
The palate was medium bodied, fresh, fleshy and delicious. Plums, blackberries, delicate white pepper and liquorice dominate, with a touch of acidity cutting through and keeping it pretty. There was a clean earthy, truffley, granitic minerality shining in the background giving some lovely complexity.
This gorgeous kit is FREE with any $20 purchase through May 12th, but you can also get it on it's own at the regular sale price
thank You For Your Power (Thank You)
The thought of it now fills our hearts with dread
1. Understand the market area and the ratio between sale price to list price. In some area it is 96% and just because your friend bought a home for 80% of asking price doesn’t mean that you will. Be sure to evaluate what has sold within the past 3-6 months.
Its nice to see the theory of plate techtonics has survived as it was just a theory when I were a lad. The kids these days have it so easy, in my day we had to map geology from inside a carboard box, in the gutter. Happy thoughts.
Johannesburg - The security wall around his property may explain why Police Minister Nathi Mthethwa is determined to shut down a Hawks investigation into a crime intelligence “slush fund”.
October: Fannie Mae discloses $1.2 billion accounting error.
Many years later, an old woman makes her way across London on a morning after a hurricane. Christmas is coming.......
Especial piquancy accompanies this news, given the admixture of true artistic genius and raunchy romperama that has characterised Moll's extraordinary life. Why, only a little while back, one gathered that Prince Philip may not have been over-keen to learn of his late actor friend James Robertson-Justice's exotic amatory encounters with Molly, featuring a light bulb.
Do you have romantic partners? If so, are they minimalists too? How does being a minimalist affect your love lives?
In esoteric writings the name Proteus has been aptly applied to the primal matter, the Akasa of the Brahmins, the Iliaster of Paracelsus.
You want advice on the matter? Call me crazy, but I think that there is no need to go biblical on your kids. The best you can do to punish is to not purchase the latest iPhone model for them. Trust me, that deprivation will feel like death to them.
and did my usual 'write-up'.
Levi had his labs drawn on Wednesday last week. They all came back good, although his ANC had dropped a little. This isn’t really that surprising or concerning; his ANC has bounced around a little at the conclusion of his last couple of rounds of chemo, and it is common for the ‘recovery’ phase to take longer each time. We are just hoping and praying that his ANC begins to grow steadily so that we can resume some of the normal trips and tasks outside the house. He has another blood test this Wednesday, so we’ll see what it does. For right now the plan is that we will let him recover all the way then take him back to the hospital for a bone marrow test to make sure everything’s still clean and clear. On another note, Steph is starting back to work tonight; she plans to head back on a couple evenings a week after I get home from work, since we can’t take Levi to daycare for awhile. It will be good to get her back on the path of normalcy and out of the house for a little while, not to mention the financial relief it will bring.
4) Female protagonist(s)
James quickly got dressed and ran out of the apartment leaving Melissa stood there speechless. She always thought he had known, like… it was something that didn’t need to be mentioned.
What does surprise her is how quickly she comes to trust Conn, and that he makes her feel both desire and desired in a way she hadn’t thought possible. But his interest in her is confusing. It doesn’t line up with the way he first looked at her. More…
—but the transfer of ownership took place in the other Member State in which copyright protection for the work did not exist or was unenforceable?”".Advocate General Jääskinen will be delivering an Opinion this Thursday. If you're lucky you may even get to find out what that Opinion is all about because, while the language of the reference is given as German, the Curia websites currently records the language of the Opinion as "Nil".
Several top-secret documents revealed that unless the ETs were specifically invited to show up by a majority of the people, and / or their leaders, they could not appear publicly and openly, on any mass scale, until the end of the year 2012.
Me: Ponder, if you do a Joey from Blossom again, i'll stab you in your asshole.
For a moment, mouth to mouth---
The Half-wayers while are victims they stand on the wrong side of the fight; they are present in every field: unions; police; judiciary; political parties; media; public service; entrepreneurs; sex workers, and even the unemployed. This complicates the struggle to bring meaningful changes while avoiding shooting yourself in the foot.
And then there are those cringeing doors you see all over the place, those doors who quiver, and let out panic stricken shrieks. We've all seen them, they have a sign.
The film is very informative and a good revision for anyone interested in Afghanistan and it’s recent history of conflict and chaos. However, from the title Shadow of Afghanistan: 1959-2012, which covers 20 years of work by renown filmmakers, I had expected a more in-depth analysis of the situation from Soviet invasion to today’s Taliban resistance.
The most literal understanding of “daily bread” is a loaf of bread in my hands to last me for the day. Some might say that is all that He means for us to ask for. I believe it is better to expand daily bread to include all that others and we need. I would, in fact, extend it beyond the material and into prayers for the needs of our bodies and our hearts:
(All for you, Scrooge McDuck).
This young man so sees the bigger picture. He sees the miracle in himself. Despite what we may suffer, the limbs we may be born without ... or lose in wartime ... we are all miracles. We have purpose. We matter.
I was so excited to open my email this morning and read the Teachers Pay Teachers weekly newsletter and find one of my items in the freebie download section! If you don't already get the newsletter you should sign up. It's sent every Sunday and always has great free products to download. Here's the link to their website and if you scroll down and look on the right-hand side bar you'll find the spot to sign up for the newsletters.
I’ve cleaned up the spelling and punctuation in the text, and separated some of the long run-on sentences into shorter and more manageable ones. Other than that, this report is as it came to me:
6. (U) PM Meles laid out to Parliament the GOE’s stark view of the situation in Somalia. He claimed that while the GOE had no problem with Somalia per se, nor even with the CIC as a whole, the CIC was now being led by extremist elements who constituted a "clear and present danger" to Ethiopia. Meles outlined three measures which he claimed constituted a "direct attack" on Ethiopia by the CIC:
?Choose warm or cool mist for customizable comfort?
I first experienced death at 13 when my Nini died from cancer. It was also the first time I remember seeing my dad cry. A little over a decade later, my dad's dad, my Big Daddy, succumbed to Parkinson's related symptoms right before the birth of my first child. But, amazingly enough, I was fortunate enough to enjoy the love and affection of my two remaining grandparents well into my adulthood. Sadly, though, my Pop Pop passed away this weekend. Somewhat suddenly, I suppose, but not so when you consider he was in his 80s, diabetic, with a heart condition.
We got a puppy! May I introduce to you, Zoe'.
And by the time the score went past the five thousand mark nearing half time, Arsenal manager Arsene Wenger knew that the fight was over. Throwing his arms into the air hopelessly, he took off his pants as a sign of defeat and left the Stadium Malawati to express his disgust.
* setting provides subtext and ambiance
Now you might think that that would be the end of it, but I was then faced with the prospect of writing my profile. Up to 2,000 characters “describing yourself, your interests and your ideal first date”.
- Brooklyn Inkspot has a great new website, and both they and sister shop Bella Greens are now on Twitter (@BrooklynInkSpot and @BellaGreens1, respectively).
Crysis 2, in a overhwhelming forest of ‘military club’ shooters, it feels unique and offers a journey that is as free as you’ll get for a game thus far in time. The highs are intense, and the more you play, the more extraordinary they become. If you give this sequel a little patience, it will set off the fireworks of the thrills you came searching for.
You know he's so far, but you wish he was nearer.
White night stands
Such a form of arguing seems to imply that there's a right and a wrong way to see these things. Now I can understand the desire to at least try to 'get right' what someone is trying to say before disagreeing with it. But I think its often subtly implied that there's a right way, and its the OOO way, and those who have a different opinion simply just don't understand it yet. Firstly, until more texts are in the public domain, the logistics of 'understanding' remains a challenging endeavor, requiring the sifting through of blog posts over many months. But more pertinently, while there are virtues to 'getting right' what a person is saying or trying to say, I'm much more interested, as Deleuze would say, with putting a philosophy 'to work.' So if saying that I or other bloggers miss something is a way of saying maybe that we disagree, fine. But its kinda condescending to say that others keep misunderstanding things. Do you mean misunderstanding you, or the 'order of things', the 'way the world works'? I promise to not condescend to you if you don't condescend to me, but so far, it feels a bit like a oneway street. Can't we agree that its ok to disagree, and not everything is misunderstanding?
“There is no reason to doubt that Mr Dewani would receive a fair hearing. South Africa has one of the best constitutions in the world and the Constitution provides for the instruments of democracy to be protected. The Constitution provides for the separation of powers and in particular the independence of the judiciary.
Something even non believers can believe in
As a matter of full disclosure (confession?) here, my own desires lean to an expansive and resistant gayness, whereas my sexual desires float around in the undeniably vanilla and conventional, that is, I find that I want a sexually exclusive life-long partnership and I want to parent. This contradiction between, on one hand, desiring and taking immense pleasure in all kinds of queering, in your face, fuck you culture of drag, S/M, risky, defiant, unabashed queerness, and on the other hand my desire for a somewhat quiet, average, unexciting home sex life causes me no small consternation. In the irritating words of the current vernacular, it is what it is.
Canvas Corp: Denim Flower
On a more postive note, the tomatoes have now all produced their second truss of flowers, the first of the Carmen cukes is starting to climb up the frame, the first of the courgettes are starting to form their first fruits, and Medwyns Giant Marrow has also set it's first fruit.
MALLORY: I don’t wanna go.
One of the things I realized quite awhile ago is I no longer want a career. I don't mind the idea of having a job, I'm pretty high energy and need something to do. The income will help ease some of the burden from Musicman also. We live a pretty simple life, we don't need much and we like it that way, but some sense of security is nice too.
The scissor fob can be personalised with your own initial as I've included a full alphabet
I took a pointer from this piece over at Lifehacker and turned off the alerts from e-mail, Twitter and Facebook on my phone. I was out of the apartment a lot yesterday and it made a huge difference.
Motor/Toughness: Just as persistent as he is off the field, Hamilton also shows a good amount of persistency while giving chase on the backside in pursuit. With that said, I do think Hamilton could be more physical at times and I am not sure if he gives his best effort from snap to snap. Hamilton’s motor is good, but I personally like to see smaller school players leave it all out on the field and having an unquestioned/great motor is something that either flashes or doesn’t; and in this case I didn’t see it from Hamilton consistently enough to catch my attention. Hamilton has the tools to be good but he needs to flash that mean, nasty, violent temperament that makes prospects stand out from the competition, especially if it is at a lower level. I also think this mean streak and relentless attitude would do wonders in terms of his ability to disengage and fight his way off blocks as he lacks that violent punch to jolt his defender.
Anna and her father have a dream of settling in Denver City. Even though Anna is only ten years old, she sees the passion in her father’s eyes when he mentions going west. But he dies soon after they arrive in New York from Holland, and Anna is forced to live with her mother’s brother, a cruel man. Six years later, Anna finds an opportunity to escape her enslavement, and takes a train west, hoping to get to Denver City and start teaching. But the train doesn’t go all the way to Denver, and the next stage will be in two weeks. Anna doesn’t have so much money, so she talks to a walk train, and even though the man is cruel, he agrees to let her walk behind them for a steep price.
"Excuse me?" The man didn't think he'd heard him properly. The boy flashed him a sheepish grin.
The information gained here should help to inform your future real estate dealings. Put the advice to work for you in your particular circumstances. Because there are so many considerations when selling property, learning about the process will be time well spent.
Gary Knowles of Ontario Institute of Studies in Education (OISE) explains, "One may be socialized into the ways of being associated with a fundamentalist Christian group, a teenage gang, Girl Guides, or into the local community."
Pube Nazi: I know all the right things to say.
On December 4, 2011, the Livingroom ConversationsWebsite went live and I co-hosted a demonstration Living Room Conversation gathering with my conservative partner Amanda Kathyrn Roman. I’m still feeling the glow. I expanded my understanding of where we might find common ground across party lines around reducing the influence of big money in politics, and people participating in the conversation expressed interest in a future Living Room Conversation about immigration. What a pleasure conversing respectfully and constructively with a small diverse group that included a Republican mayor and a Republican candidate for state elected office. Intimate, structured conversations work!
I cringe when I hear women my age talk about how they plan to delay having children until they reach X milestone in their educational pursuits or their careers. I have another friend back in America who has been talking about starting a family for the past three years and is now 32 and still on birth control, practicing her parenting skills on her parakeets.
And in the barren wasteland that is the days before the exam results pop through the door, many, including myself, begin to over think what our purpose in life is. I’m so bored and anxious about my future, I find myself doing “What is your life’s purpose?! quiz’s on questionable websites with adverts at the side containing blonde, overly tanned women asking me if I’m single and would I like a good time. No thanks love. Put your top back on.
Him: "Who would buy that?"
The weather has been changing, and the northern wind has been blowing in, rattling my windows and blowing through my hair, making it a tangled mess, but I love it. With the changing weather, my mood has also been changing for the better—at least for today—and that is a good thing. The overcast skies remind me that cold weather and the holidays are soon approaching, and I couldn't be more ready. Though, I'm a little disappointed in the stubbornness of the changing of the leaves this year. The colors aren't as bold and bright as they have been in previous years—or maybe my mind is playing tricks on me, the past month or so affecting the vibrancy of everything around me.
I defy anyone in this room to provide me with a constant in the field of economics that has the same unchanging constancy that exists in the fields of physics or chemistry. And yet, in paper after paper here at the Federal Reserve, I see equations built as though constants do exist.
Protein: 13 grams per 8 oz. bowl
There are really no words to describe each of the sets because they all exceeded my expectations and I got to experience them right front and center, masked within the rest of the photographers most of the time, fighting for the best shots. I’ll share a few of my favorites here.
I still can’t quite believe that tomorrow I’ll be moving into my new apartment in the Bronx.
Elise strode into the courtyard with purpose. She could do this, but her footsteps faltered as she caught sight of the parrot tulips blooming to the right of the stone bench. Jack had planted those for her last year- back when all had been right in their world. Now she wondered if anything would ever be right again.
Clyde"The good Lord gave you a body that can stand most anything. It's your mind you have to convince"-Vince Lombardi
"I will be on the lookout for an "assailant" with several companions."
While I actually dislike writing (because I am not good at it), I do enjoy keeping a record of my musical experiences such as concerts and festivals, and sharing my passion for music as I enjoy the music and words of those much more talented than me.
Square One Brewery (1727 Park Avenue) While the beer scene in St. Louis has moved quickly in the past few years, it’s always nice to see some places that were ahead of the curve. Opened in 2006, Square One has not only put out some unique beers, but they’re also the first microdistillery restaurant in the state of Missouri.
Next time I might go so far as to briefly broil the crust UPSIDE DOWN before removing it, putting on the toppings, and sliding it back under the broiler right side up.
Avoid pain in your knees by elevating your pelvis as high as is necessary with folded blankets. Align your heels directly under your outer hips (this is less stressful for the knees than the standard alignment of having your heels outside of your hips). Keep your knees slightly apart, with your thighbones parallel. Place your feet in line with your shins. Sit for several minutes daily. Gradually lower the props over a period of weeks or months.
Back then, our neighbors were all cousins and siblings and parents of my parents. Everyone was someone’s Tita or Tito, Ninang or Ate. My older siblings left the house each morning to play all day wherever they wanted and came home only at dusk, to be hosed down outside in the yard before my mother would let them enter her clean kitchen. Where we all still look back, even if we don’t remember what we are missing.
Despite the strong tendency to use names as a method for obliterating the African lineage, many women, across the age group, retained names from their African roots. Names such as Quasheeba, run along side the European convention of using names of the plantation in which the 312 were ‘breed’ such as Romney, , or names of the enslaver, such as Woodley. Names also gave clues to blood relationships in that the concepts of ‘old’ and ‘little’ were used to link blood related people. But in some cases the sharing of a name did not necessarily imply a genealogical relationship but instead suggests a connection to a place or a person who is not a blood relative.
I grew in a house of 4 strong-minded, pretty outspoken women: me, my 2 sisters and my mom. We’ve also added a mini toy poodle to combat my mom and dad’s empty nest… also a (strong, out-barking) woman. (I swear my father is one of the most amazing men in the world.)
Now, educators and others are trying to figure out just what the incident means.
In a 2001 essay in the New York Times, Lous Uchitelle observed that politicians in the U.S. have preferred to define poverty solely in terms of income. Uchitelle argued that this approach would say that a family with adequate income is not in poverty, even if that family must continue to live in atrocious ghetto conditions because it cannot find alternative places where its members would be accepted and could thrive.
Skills: Climbing d8, Fighting-d8, Notice-d10, Persuasion-d10, Stealth-d10, Survival-d12, Throwing-d8, Tracking d8, Psionics-d12, Spellcasting-d12
Eventually, the party was able to contact the bishop of Redwraith and scout out the environs of the Black Tower. Here is a summary of the information they managed to gather:
“One is said to be situated in the fully renounced order of life if he lives in accordance with Kṛṣṇa consciousness. He should be without attachment for sense gratification and should accept only what is necessary for the upkeep of the body. On the other hand, one who renounces things that could be used in the service of Kṛṣṇa, under the pretext that such things are material, does not practice complete renunciation.”
In the now-empty mixer bowl, whip the heavy cream at medium speed until it begins to thicken. Increase the speed to high, and whip until soft peaks form when the whisk is lifted. Using a rubber spatula, fold the whipped cream into the mousse until no white streaks remain. Spoon into 6 to 8 individual serving dishes - I like to use teacups - or, if you’re feeling casual, mound it up in a single serving bowl. Cover with plastic wrap, and refrigerate until firm, at least 2 hours and up to 24 hours.
To watch the trailer for the book, please click on the link below ...
It was interesting to see how Weiner starts the chapter of the grumpy nation Moldova with a quote from a German philosopher “because they feel unhappy, men cannot bear the sight of someone they think is happy.” With Moldova, the reader gets to sense misery and recognize the elements of happiness that were missing. Moldova, the former Soviet Union was a nation that was part of a culture. A nation that could afford to do many things till the day they declared their liberation. “Hot means nothing without cold” That is how Moldovans realized they were once happy.
Then we talked some more about the boy who will mow our lawn.
International Christian Recovery Coalition
At the end of May beginning of June my world exploded into crazy. Work, always stressful. Money, never enough. Falling more in love with a wonderful man, amazing! Having my heart stolen by his adorable son, precious. Finding out that precious little boy tested positive for meth, earth shattering. Helping Stuart fight for and get sole custody (temporary until Oct and it’s made official), worth every sleepless night, stress headache, and tear shed.
3.) This award is for any co-blogging friend who always stops by and is kind to you. you can count on them to always be one of the great comments at the end of your posts.
Well, if this episode is any indication, there will be more scandal, heartbreak and backstabbing. How I missed you Gossip Girl! After a long break, we pick things up with Blair acting more secretive than ever, Chuck and Louis teaming up (yeah, like that will last!) and Charlie still missing. Where to begin?
This is not a John Punter novel, Klein has moved away from the protagonist of Punter’s Luck, Punter’s Turf and Silk Chaser (Ned Kelly Award nominee) but he remains in Victoria. In Ring of Fire the main character is Ryan Carlisle and Ryan is a racing steward. So, basically, Klein has moved his readers from one side of the racing game to the other and given us a glimpse into what might take place behind the doors in the steward’s room.
-Punk throws chairs into the ring before throwing Jericho into the ring.
For reasons which do not extend much beyond me having had a quiet Saturday afternoon this weekend and having the urge to have a tinker online, I have decided to move platform to blog.com. So for the few of you who were good enough to leave me on your blogrolls and might like to see any future posts (which, will at best be sporadic much like in the last year or so) – please can you redirect to HERE. There will (I hope) be a few posts coming up in the next few weeks at the new site.
Then we need some wine. Just to start the faux honeymoon off on the right foot. (Weddings can be such stressful things.) I'm thinking a long boozy lunch. Russian caviar. Some Mouton Rothschild '99. And enough lush interior design to keep us amused between courses. I know. Let's book a private room at Lapérouse. Steeped in history, this is the restaurant where mistresses of politicians used to scratch their rings on the mirrors to see if their jewels were real or not. We won't need to do that, of course. We'll know our pink diamonds are the Authentic Come-To-Mamma Numbers. The best part, however, is that it's possible to book a private room all to ourselves. They even come with a daybed to, er, louche on between servings. (*Not that we'd need that.) You simply ring a buzzer when you want the waiter to come and pour some more of that Rothschild. So very French to think of things like that.
of her room
4 confused
We came east last year about three weeks later than this, and I seem to recall that things were not as far along as they are this year. The second week of April, 2011, found us driving into spring as we went further east and northeast. The first day of April, 2012, feels more like early summer. Not complaining. Just sayin’…
Giant tape recorder audio logs Giant tape recorder audio logs
"Mason crawled 4 steps" is what it said. How ironic is it that I am a stay at home mom but I miss out on one of his firsts.
“The former treatise have I made, O Theophilus, of all that Jesus began both to do and teach, Until the day in which he was taken up, after that he through the Holy Ghost had given commandments unto the apostles whom he had chosen; To whom also he shewed himself alive after his passion by many infallible proofs, being seen of them forty days, and speaking of the things pertaining to the kingdom of God.”
And then last summer she disappeared. After telling mom she was trying to stay clean, she coerced her grandma into paying for her car repairs and fled. She got a new cellphone number.
Names are a difficulty for me, I admit. I love names. I appreciate a well turned name, made up or no. But I've never been good at inventing them. I'm no Tolkien. So I've been appropriating names from history and from mythology to use in my world. Akhet, the name of one country in my world, is the Egyptian name for the horizon. Another land is even less inspired, Breizh is simply the Breton language name for Brittany. The island of Palis I adapted from an early name that Tolkien made up but never ultimately used. (Which was an intentional homage to his influence on me.) Character names are no better. Narmer was the name of a very early Egyptian king as was Menes. Sollon is Solon, the Greek politician and philosopher, with the oh-so-clever addition of an L.
League Final.
Buh Buh (Bye Bye)
I suppose I could check out the address in Sheffield or look through census records to discover who Miss Marsh was. I could research Army Service Corps barracks in the Birmingham area. But I think I prefer to leave it as a snapshot of an unknown life, captured at a particular moment in time when G is ill and Raymond is taken up with a perambulating cat.
“You stinking piece of shit! Do you not know your propriety? All Lords are your Lords!” he said angrily, cruelty on his lips. “I would beseech you to seek out the lore of feudalism if I was not so certain that you are too dense to attain such understanding!”
1 After the Sabbath, at dawn on the first day of the week, Mary Magdalene and the other Mary went to look at the tomb.
I came to the UK to talk about the plight of the Palestinians but ended up fighting deportation. This is what I wanted to say
10/20 - Albany, NY - Northern Lights
Is there another character who deserves a mention? Again I return to Maia, because more is learnt about her past, which makes her both more vulnerable, and also stronger.
This beats a little train on the ground.....didn't go on it tho'.
YANP: So this will be the seventh year of music now, what are the biggest lessons that you’ve learned what do you wish you would have known?
You know, just to let him know who is the boss.
Sugar’s sweet, so is she,
2006-2007, with the horse placed in the top four in each of his six races, but without winning. He came close, though, finishing four lengths second to Halcon Genelardais in the Coral Welsh National, and, three weeks later, showed his powers of recovery by coming the same distance behind Ladalko in the totesport.com Classic Chase at Warwick. Mon Mome’s final outing of the 2006/07 campaign was in the JLT Specialty Handicap Chase at the Cheltenham Festival in March and again the horse acquitted himself well, finishing fourth. In the 2007/08 season he did not reappear until February, when he was pulled up at Wincanton. Ten days later, he contested a hurdle at Folkestone and, 36lb lower than his chase rating, was made favourite, but was tapped for toe and could only finish third. On the agenda for the second successive year was the JLT Specialty Handicap Chase at the Cheltenham Festival, but he did not match the fourth place of a year earlier, plugging on for sixth. He then headed to Aintree for his first attempt at the John Smith’s Grand National and ran a decent enough race to finish 10th under Aidan Coleman. The 2008/09 campaign began brightly with a fine second behind Possol at Haydock in November and he built on that promise with his first win in over two years in a valuable handicap chase at Cheltenham in December. That win saw him head the early market for the John Smith’s Grand National but he subsequently failed to reproduce that form after losing his confidence due to a jumping error in the Welsh National at Chepstow, in which he came home eighth. He was then second in a novices’ hurdle at Towcester, seventh to Rambling Minster in a handicap chase at Haydock and eighth in the John Smith’s Midlands National at Uttoxeter. Having been forgotten by most punters, Mon Mome emphatically returned to form at Aintree in April, relishing the big spruce fences and four and a half mile test. He returned to action for the 2009/10 season in the Hennessy Gold Cup at Newbury in November but was pulled up four fences from home behind Denman. He stayed on well to take third in the Grade Two Albert Bartlett Novices’ Hurdle over three miles at Cheltenham the following month and posted a pair of respectable efforts in valuable handicap chases at Haydock Park on his next two outings. He warmed up perfectly for a third attempt at the John Smith’s Grand National when staying on to be an excellent third in the Grade One Betfred Cheltenham Gold Cup in March, 2010, and was still in contention when falling five fences out in the Aintree showpiece. A setback ruled Mon Mome out of the whole of the 2010/2011 season and he returned to action at Haydock Park on December 17, 2011, when he came home fifth in a novices’ hurdle. He showed the benefit of that outing by filling the runner-up spot in a Cheltenham handicap chase on January 1 but was pulled up on heavy ground at Haydock Park on his two next starts – in the Peter Marsh Chase on January 21 and in the Betfred Grand National Trial on February
It is interesting to note that more and more medical studies are confirming that stress and psychological disturbances are often related to chronic constipation. Many psychologists concur with the Chinese system of medicine which associates ‘inability to let go of past hurts or memories, or difficulties in coming to terms with grief and loss as a common factor in patients with chronic constipation.
BAD STUFF: There’s really not much bad about this movie, except for the focus on Hip Hop music, which I think SUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUCKS. I tend to dislike dramas for the sake of being dramas… But I also tend to like most movies I see. The worst thing about this movie, really, is that it’s quite depressing. But it’s also quite poignant.
Brylee says...."Actually, I won't be able to clean my own room until I get 4. But I am only 3 now."
After making ourselves at home in this laid back, backpacker friendly island, Amanda and I quickly adapted to the number one thing to do here… Scuba Dive! Kindly, the wind decided to “shit itself” and that’s where our underwater adventures began. Armed with regulators and cylinders we began our submarine search…. wanna know what we’ve found? Next post will tell you all about it!
Following this news his two youngest daughters, one a sophomore at Dayton University, the other a junior in high school, sent me a message asking if they could come on Saturday and have me teach them how to bake pies! This was a great compliment because just about a month before they had been here and we baked cut out sugar cookies. It must have been a successful day because they wanted to come back again. For years, after a number of years of struggling with pie crust, I thought I could make good pie crust. Then I experienced several times some that was served by a long time friend that I decided was better than mine. I asked her for her recipe and have used it for several years. (Thanks, Treeva.)
. . . the whole business of approaching the struggle with religion as if it were a card game, or a horse race, or some kind of battle of wits, just feels all wrong — or it does, at any rate, to me. When I was growing up, where I was growing up, there was a critique of religion according to which religion was cruel, and a lie, and a mechanism of enslavement, and something full of loathing and contempt for every­thing essentially human. Maybe that was true and maybe it wasn’t, but it had to do with important things — it had to do, that is, with history, and with suffering, and with the hope of a better world — and it seems like a pity, and more than a pity, and worse than a pity, with all that in the back of one’s head, to think that all that gets offered to us now, by guys like these, in books like this, is the pale, small, silly, nerdy accusation that religion is, I don’t know, dumb.
The letter looked suspiciously like a “love letter”, but Arata had his doubts. More likely it was a cruel practical joke perpetrated by one of his buddies, especially when the initials matched those belonging to “Nogi Hatsune”, also know as “Miss Engineer”, the reigning heartthrob of the engineering department. Why would somebody like her be interested in a nobody like himself?
What about prints?
Allendale is a brewery that has undergone a lot of product development recenty. It was a long time back now when Allendale gave me my first valuable work experience in an actual brewery. For that week head man Tom Hick showed me some of the trials and tribulations of running a ten-barrel brewery in an old farm building with only two or three people. I even helped them paint their first pub (for a few hours anyway).
4. What do you like to do to get exercise?
5625 rent/food/transportation per day ($125/day x 45 days)
Gary and I have always shared a kiss as he leaves for work, and again once we're home for the evening. Our day just doesn't seem complete without those kisses.
George Bohannon (trombone);
I love those guys and they have always been super professional with me and never BS anyone.
“It’s fine – I can cover it, just about,” he eventually concluded (like he had any choice in the matter), although he was still clearly tortured by the ghost of that solitary Bellini which had contemptuously burst his budget without even touching his lips.
Just another song about another hopeless cause.
What you are, you be
PS - This isn't one of those grand formal challenges where I'm hosting and other people join in etc. However, I certainly don't mind if anyone else wants to do this alongside me and set their own 30-week goal! I'd be happy for the company!! :)
Student: Earlier (We need to talk about names. Did Beyond write this? *flips over page to look at name*)(I ACTUALLY have a student named Beyond.)
Everyone sleeps all day (check!) and then goes out at night, on Saturdays.
The schedule is totally booked the next day (my day off) but knowing the cat must be seen, I’m pushing for first thing in the morning. And the gal, is saying all these plans she has and wants to schedule the appointment in 2 days. I’m having to insist the problem is life threatening and go through the spiel again. Finally, I ask if she has any friends that could bring the cat in first thing tomorrow morning. She lights up and decides to have a friend bring the kitty in.
Thanks for coming, it's great to see you here and to to celebrate my favorite holiday with family and friends!
If this still makes you nervous instead of thrilled, now seems like a good time for a reminder about the March Quickie Tarot Special: 15 minutes for $33.33. The usual $55.55 half hour or $111 hour remain available, too. All energy represents choice. The larger the challenge, the greater potential for lasting gains. What energies and choices do you face today?
That’s when the rain starts. That cloud that kept creeping closer has got backing and now sheds its load of water on us. A few warning drops at first turn into huge splashes raising the smell of dust from the pavement. Then, the downpour – white sheets joining the sky and the earth, like giant whips of unseen and revengeful gods. We don’t budge, don’t relinquish the hold on each other, we don’t even close our eyes.
to make you
"What needs to be clear is that we are not in a position to just hand over a cheque for a perceived amount.
2 cups mini Reese peanut butter cups, chopped, plus 1 1/2 cups more for garnish (about 2 - 12oz. bags)
The Mother instructed her son to place about 4 scoops of flour into a large ziplock baggie and said that she would be right down to retrieve the baggie. She indicated she would knock on the door three times upon arrival, at which time the idiot was to be at the front door with her flour.
He is a Rays fan (and a NY football Giants fan, but we won't hold that against him) and contrary to popular opinion he isn't 97-years-old. I had the honor of attending my first playoff and World Series games with him back in 2009 where he proved that he could indeed fit in the space beneath the sink in one of Tropicana Field's suite. He is also the man for getting Michael Taylor to "pound it and lock it in" when he was just an unknown kid playing in Clearwater.
I mean, one is awesome, but two in one weekend? It's unheard of.
The second issue unrelated to the purchase of a car for Spoilboy involves his girlfriend. If you look up the definition of “clingy” in the dictionary, you will see a picture of this young woman beside the word. Frankly, she was bothered me for a long time with her incessant talking and ability to bend Spoilboy to her whims. Several times, I have had to remind my son that before he makes any plans with his girlfriend he is to confer with his mother or me first. However, over the last few months Spoilboy’s girlfriend has felt the need to show up at our house very early in the morning on the weekends and hang out with him all day. This has gone way beyond the normal range of visits in both number and durations forcing my wife and I to put a limit on the time they spend together.
it's all "裂纹和怒吼" and then there's the offering bucket thing and it's
Think about how good I'll look for Oprah, talking about my book, after a year of nothing but sushi and water.
and be for this place horizon
Second, do not use coarse items to clean your furniture. This means feather dusters are out of the picture. The broken feathers could nick your antique arm chair and cause unwanted marks. While these marks can make your furniture look more antique than ever, it could open up pockets in the woodwork that can cause decay.
“No, Nanook. I think today, I’ll have…………let’s see…… how about the number two special of the whale blubber breakfast sandwich. Oh…… could you make that three. I need one for Melvin, and that Polar Bear clinging to the roof of my car. He looks a little hungry.”
Then she said to me... "Mommy, I need to do one more card! I forgot about Kelly!"
I didn't realize how much stuff I had made. Yikes. I'm not even done yet.
10 physical
We have only a few samples from the team this week as we have lost a couple of members recently and the others are on vacation.
“You’ve had too much to drink. Come on. I’ll get us a cab.”
Hello Lovelies!!
Ludowyk, E. F. C. 1966 The Modern History of Ceylon, London: Weidenfeld & Nicolson.
There is a beautiful song by Julie de Azevedo called
3. What is your favorite place to buy clothes/shoes? I don't really have a favorite place. I find clothes all over the place and if its a good bargain, then its all mine!
my memories of gymnastics will unfortunately always be coloured by this girl.
It was a cold and windy night, as the howling winds beat upon the window panes. Inside, body warmth was not only touching my skin but my soul. I started holding her hand and caressing her soft skin. She pressed her lips against mine as my heart began beating faster. My tongue brushed the delicate shell of her ear as I blew a light breath over the moist spot. She shivered. Passion took over as I began fondling her breasts as our love-making intensified. At that moment, I felt my collective consciousness leaving my body, and a feeling of oneness appeared.
stickles gilitter - 'icicle/frosted lace'
This coffee table from Amanda at Girl in Pink is quite the find! It's a pretty shade of creamy white with beautiful carvings and a bit of a distress wash to it. All her accessories finish off the look. I think I have coffee table envy! Check out the full post over at...
However, since the industry looks so promising, other manufacturers are also positioning to capture a pie of the booming market.
Directed & Edited by: Andrew Bennett
To take this soul with simple grace,
So glad you came back again today! I really do appreciate your dedication and I hope you're enjoying my blog. With Valentines Day coming up so soon I thought it would be nice to post some traditional Valentines Day items with a twist, because thats something Etsy does so well, adding a twist on the ordinary to make it extraordinary! I really hope you enjoy everything I find today and keep reading!
It is not passive, and it is not necessarily easy. Many of our thought patterns and responses are so embedded we are not even aware of them. But part of the system of MT helps to identify them. As time moves on, and we establish new ways of interacting with our bodies, minds, and the world around us, many of the symptoms begin to reduce in their severity and may disappear altogether.
Try to avoid mixed lighting, e.g. sunlight through a window mixed with artificial light. Depending on the strength and quality of light sources, you could either turn the artificial lights off or block out the window light.
Even as I write down this older poem it evokes such strong memories. I am there again, summertime. I can’t wait to climb that huge staircase, greet my grandparents, and endure their huge hugs and kisses. This poem was a couple of years in the works. I had only divorced a few months ago when a friend invited me to go to the movies on my birthday. It was early February afternoon which turned out to be the coldest, windiest day of the year. The movie was Nobody’s Fool starring Paul Newman. In one scene Paul Newman ran after his friend whose feelings he had hurt. He sat next to him behind this one house. It had the same shingles as my grandfather’s. I was hit with such a wave of nostalgia, that tears ran down my face even as the wind stung my cheeks. As we ran to the car, my friend asked me, “Why the hell are you crying?” I thought it was just getting over the whole divorce. It wasn’t. I was remembering my grandfather. That feeling lingered for a long time. A few years later I watched the same movie and again felt those feelings emerged. I wrote a poem just to purge my system. I showed it to my brother. He said he hadn’t thought about that place in a long time and this brought it all back.
Lemon or lime is a natural bleach.It is very effective for oily skin.you should take 2 to3 table spoon milk and add few drops of lemon juice in it and apply it to your face leave it over night wash it the next morning…..
If any one has ideas as to how to get over this nonsense - leave a comment!
We're very excited to announce that Ana Romero is now representing White Riot and they will being showing the collection at the show.
The Capital Confectioners cake club had their Christmas party yesterday. We had some great food and good laughs. The best part was definitely coming home with a big stash of cookies from our cookie exchange!
i'm going to miss this two year old.
Last night I attended one such party. My wonderful friend Neal turned the heat up to 85 degrees, queued up various surf themed LPs, and mixed pina coladas. February in Portland was never so tropical.
Sanna Sender: recorder
I am sorry to scare you!!
forgetting to eat, then
The bar is in the premises last known as the Millhouse (which embarrassingly proclaimed itself “a great pub” on a sign outside. Erm, we’ll be the judge of that, thanks), the scene of several previous failed bar ventures. It’s the attempt by Fuller Thomson, operators of bars such as the Holyrood 9a in Edinburgh, to create a serious beer establishment in the west end of Glasgow. I’ve never been particularly impressed by the beer on offer in the Holyrood 9a the couple of times I’ve been there, so I was cautiously curious, albeit not wetting myself in anticipation.
Whole black pepper corn: 7 no
Mr John Young
Some of the History Girls will be putting up books they've recently read (without reviews) at the end of their posts. These are two I've recently read - the first by our own History Girl, Louisa Young, short-listed for the Costa which deals with the ravages of WWI and The Sisters Brothers which is a cowboy story with a difference set in similar terrain to the Karoo which was short-listed for the Booker:
These militias were then unleashed upon white Zim farmers, as well as on MDC-supporting rural populations. The local Zim police refused to intervene when farmers & workers were attacked & murdered by militias, yet acted very hastily when the odd farmer dared to defend himself with lethal force.
The first? Probably one of my fave books, "The Sweet Life In Paris" by David Lebovitz! I'm really excited that this blog-legend-god-chef-man is the next awesome writer to join the ranks of the Paris Proust Files on JNSQ!
Tuesday 8th
I was raised on puzzles. Many Saturday afternoons, especially in winter when I was not brave enough to go outside and face the subzero windchills, I would crawl up next to my mom who loved to work crossword puzzles, worked them nearly daily. There I learned that olio – odds and ends fans – was different than oleo one spreads on toast, that alee was toward the sheltered side and that tar wasn’t only something to put on a roof or road, sailor.
If you are interested in purchasing this watercolour painting (420 x 297 mm/16.5 x 11.7 in, framed and mounted, £75), or want to see a larger photo, contact me on poeticoxana@gmail.com
You know what, it's either too early or too late to make complicated decisions like that. I'll leave it for a while.
08-18 Hylands Park and Weston Park, England – V Festival
Natural - No Sugar Peanut Butter, Banana, Ice, Soy Protein Powder, Spinach, Almond Milk Smoothie
I wonder about the model, who she was, what was her name;
But I'll skip over that. Here's the thing: PUBLISHERS ARE SUPPOSED TO PAY YOU.
This is the Catholic Faith, which except a man believe faithfully, he cannot be
Ashes to ashes, dust to dust; the simple phrase that anyone can relate to the ultimate end of one’s physical body. In a world where children, young men and women across the world have seen so much of death in such a short period of time, many of us still fear it. It is the great unknown. The sphere of departure.
Since worry seems to come naturally to moms what should we do about it? Here are three ways I would like to encourage you.
Where?
I won't lie, the floaty me was screaming, WHAT THE HELL ARE YOU DOING!!!
When several shapeshifters working for Raphael Medrano — the male alpha of Clan Bouda and Andrea's former lover — die unexpectedly at a dig site, Andrea is assigned to investigate ... and must work with Raphael. As her search for the killer leads her into the secret underbelly of supernatural Atlanta, Andrea knows that dealing with her feelings for Raphael might have to take a backseat to saving the world...
next morning's miracles?
Usually in the middle of the old one.
I always loved dance and started taking folk dancing lessons at a small local when I was five years old. I knew that I wanted to be a professional dancer when I was a teenager and began serious training in Classical Ballet.
Job 33:25 His flesh shall be fresher than a child’s: he shall return to the days of his youth.
We wanted the nails to be in line, so we started this process by marking them as we went. (Later, I started marking them ahead of him because I wasn’t much help anywhere else). This also really sped up the process since he didn’t need to measure every 16 inches. After a while, Dustin made a jig to help with the measuring and marking for where the nails went. Then I just had to line it up with the previous board and mark rather than measure for every single nail.
The MFI’s staff are happy with the initiative. However, they are challenged by the down-times by the Mobile Network Operators’ system and the low literacy levels of most of their clients, which means they must spend a lot of time helping clients send their repayment. This close assistance can lead to fraud, as a loan officer may send money to his or her own phone account or to a wrong account, intentionally or accidentally. One way of mitigating this risk involves proper client training and awareness.
No clue where to start? Well, everyone starts somewhere. And it’s not as important as where you start as the fact you start – NOW. The first thing I want you to do is read the below text in it’s entirety. Before you do keep in mind the question “How could this apply to my AO?”
Ok, so this is somewhat insignificant in the fight against inequality, but I really do think it’s unfair that women get all the interesting underwear. Bras can be balconette, control, under-wired, push up, ¾ cup, peephole, halter neck, strapless. Then there’s briefs, thongs, boy shorts, French knickers, tangas, G-strings, low rise, high cut: the list goes on and on … basques, camisoles, corsets, baby dolls etc. Did I mention fabrics? From silk and lace to fishnet and satin. Don’t even get me started on colours!
Curran and Seaton show that the market did successfully accomplish what state intervention failed to do. Following the repeal of the punitive taxes on newspapers between I853 and I869, a new daily local press came into existence, but not one new local working-class daily was established through the rest of the nineteenth century. Curran and Seaton note that
A few tbls of brown sugar
Musings: God is in the process of turning open the shades and letting light fall upon the nature of our beings. The American Dream is fading and the nightmare of a Christless world is ever tormenting our slumbering souls. The Church has largely always been seen as existing as an island in a sea of trouble, but now, it is more like a boat off the shores of Malta, enduring the battering waves of unbelief. The Ozone is depleting and the Son is ever hardening the hearts of stone and giving them over to wantonness, vain imaging, and gods of their own making (usually ones that include themselves). Of course, we’ve been here before. As in the days of Noah,….the waves will buffet and the winds will howl, but none inside will be lost.
Good Morning all! I am late with my challenge this week. There have been lots going on and it's been tough keeping up with everything...However here is my card this week. I hope you all like it.
5 € for adults, free for those under 18
The best thing about MLSP is that you can muster all your strength through sharing your struggles with people in the community. MLSP is a support community, so don’t ever think you’re alone in this MLM battle. If you’re afraid of taking a leap in your MLM venture, you can always seek guidance from the mentors. After all, they’ve been in the industry for years, so you have no reason to doubt their judgment.
So insecure you see
IMDb: 7.5/10 Rotten Tomatoes: 47% rotten Metacritic: 52/100
“The only minor issue that ever occurred was choreographers clashing,” Annie said.
though too far for her to hear from inside,
A computer screen? An automobile screen? All three screens
the words off their page,
Good evening all.i`m back again, do scroll down if you`d like to see my PFP card.so i have had a little play in my corner, helps me to wind down.lol.
In the case of Amanda Hocking, as a writer, I would have been excited to hear how oftentimes belittled self-publishing landed her a fantastic deal with St. Martin's (because I truly believe there are some great self-published works out there), but when I continued reading the article I felt disgust more than anything else. I often hear people say, "Why, I should write a book. I'd make soooo much money." I just shake my head. But then a story like this crops up and I think, "Yeah, you should write that book, Mr. I-have-no-idea-how-to-even-do-it. How much worse could your writing possibly be?" After all, if Hocking and Snooki can pull it off, then anybody can pull it off. Right?
"That's not a personal question," she cried. "That's a normal question!"
Lani and Chrispin have hidden their feelings for one another for years, but when they are finally free to express their love, both are afraid to cross the line that has always been there.
And you gotta love a Bolo Yeung appearance. This crazy big, crazy tittied, crazy looking dude popped up in a couple Van Damme flicks and hardly says anything. I don't think he said anything at all here actually. I'm kinda shocked actually to find out that he was over 50 years old when he made this film!
Using a small scooper scoop out onto lined baking sheets.
I think the American people understand and I think the justices should understand that, in the absence of an individual mandate, you cannot have a mechanism to ensure that people with preexisting conditions can actually get health care. So there's not only an economic element to this and a legal element to this, but there's a human element to this.
It’s gonna getcha
51 wanna
Who does it remind you of?
I wake, put on water, wait for tea.
With zest and zeal they hopped around enjoying all the fun
What if there are children involved?
Last week, they hauled 'the big red dog' (as dad likes to call him) up to a church owned camp my parents were helping to run for a family reunion and let him run about. He apparently was a big help with the mopping up:
I will be away for a while going in tomorrow for a hysterectomy. Hopefully when I get back on my computer I will have lot's of new followers. Definitely something to look forward too, Anyone who wants to leave suggestions on how to deal with surgical menopause I would love to hear from you.
Murdoch sold at the highest point of Newscorp share values this year, and according to the record books this is the biggest non-deal connected sale he has ever undertaken. He was out to raise the maximum in cash. Why?
Stopping I hold her hips nope I say
I had never been to a screening of a movie before so when I was asked if I wanted to go, I didn't hesitate.
Take a look in the November 2009 Classic Rock magazine. It's Europe's biggest rock publication and you'll find Magic Ship's 'LoveTel Motel' on the cover CD.
Hello, and welcome to my new blog!
Greetings! Another weekend has just blown by and it's Monday again. Today I have a family recipe for a quick banana bread that I've modified to fit into my style of cooking and eating and I'm excited to share it with you.
While large portion of Thai people still prefer to stay “apolitical”, there is an ongoing battle going on by major Propaganda players to sway this large mass into one or other political direction. There are full scale “info-wars” and even officially announced by Thai government “Media war” going on. Many alternative sources of information are rigidly being censored or completely closed, many websites blocked, and the remaining Thai MSM (Main Stream Media) exercise a lot of “self-censorship”, at the same time fiercely attacking any rivals.
Second, as you are no doubt aware, last month the state of California began issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples. Yes, we’ve seen this before (Massachusetts), but what makes this threat so grave is that California—unlike Massachusetts—allows non-residents to get married, even if they are from one of the 48 states that still prohibit so-called same-sex “marriage.”
I think they taste better than Luna or Cliff..
The best thing going on right now is how good my mom is doing. She is responding so well to chemo that they might be able to increase her dosage, having her go every week instead of 3 weeks on and 1 week off. I am so proud of her and her outlook. She has remained optimistic and cheerful and isn't whining or feeling sorry for herself. She still does everything, sees her friends, even drives herself to and from her chemo appointments. The only thing she "can't" do is the dishes, but I think that's just because she doesn't want to.
A fundamentalist mob threatened a group of Sufi-leaning immigrants to cancel a concert claiming that music is un-Islamic.
Right, I'll go back to contact my friend in the boonies now. So you'll have to excuse me. Untill (maybe) later.
We stayed at Miniloc Island, one of four resorts in El Nido, and it was definitely the ideal home for a few days. Superb customer service, really chill atmosphere. The rooms were nothing fancy though — in fact, they were just “modernized” nipa huts — but we didn’t mind. After all, we just used them for when we needed to recharge.
For some reason she entered some crazy ass contest. I totally understand having entered a couple myself. We do it on a lark, and then we get into it, wanting those votes, wanting to win win win!!!!!!!
Some say that makeup has healing powers. Even if you
Brightcove, Inc.
GARROSH: Hamuul, I’m glad you’re doing better these days.
a world of colour of blue, green, yellow
Amy Welsh thought she had her own private drug stash in a hands-off zone: She hid her Roxicodone in aTylenol tube inside her vagina and her crack inside her bra, reports Will Greenlee in his Off the Beat blog for TCPalm.com in Stuart.
I read somewhere that the human mind literally does not remember the pain we were once in. This makes sense. Had I not recorded it, I would completely underestimate the terrible mess I was the weeks before the Rooster was born. I think this causes us to sometimes gloss over others pain. “I did that and it wasn’t that bad,” when in actuality “I did that and I don’t remember it being that bad.” Those are very different things. I know that my circumstances are not hopeless, they just feel that way right now. I feel pretty strongly that if nothing else the Lord is calling me to be transparent, and I want to honor that by writing how I really feel, through the mess, so that someone else can stumble upon this when they are all messed up to, but hopefully read ahead and feel reassured. Some of you (mom) worry a little when I do this. I am okay, or if I am not the Lord is working on me. This is the dark underbelly I am exposing. In His infinite wisdom, God had some things planned already for me to read that are cleaning this out.
So some days, this character heads off to the woods for a bit of chopping, trapping, hunting…whatever might bring a few coppers into his pocket. Evenings, he meets up with mates for a pint; at night, he dreams of softer beds and warmer clothes.
Logan, UT ?
The researchers said this week they've found a chemical compound that spurs hair growth by blocking a stress-related hormone associated with hair loss -- at least in mice.
This isn’t a radical idea. It is the same idea that founded the country. In fact, the founding fathers wrote it into the Constitution. If the populace feels that the government is no longer serving their best interest, we can dissolve it and create a new one. That is why we have freedom of speech, the right to bear arms and the right to assemble.
If you are in the Chicagoland area, I just got word that 3 of my encaustic paintings will be shown by The Black Cloud Gallery this February at their third Art Bazarre. I will post information about that soon, but the gist is that every piece of artwork that will be in the gallery has to be $200, no more, no less. So if you are in the market for affordable art at $200, then you should definitely check out the show.
Come join is this month and show us what you're creating with this lovely sketch! Can't wait to see!
The Replicators have, in deed, advanced. Five of them have now taken on human form. One of them is even a Scottish Lord from Days of Our Lives! the humanoid Replicators have not quite hit T-1000 territory yet, but there are hints of their malleability and some mind reading powers. They are modeled after Reese, so they possess her flaw. The SG-1 team cons one of the more advanced models into betraying the others by convincing him their flaw is too dangerous to let them off world to reproduce. They plan to reverse the time device back to the way the Asgard intended and take him with them, but in reality, he becomes frozen in time with the others because even he is deemed too dangerous.
I won't lie; part of me would quite gladly stay away forever. Imagine if the only things you had to do all day was lazing by a pool, or swimming in the ocean, or just sitting. And listening. To the quiet stillness.
Artein is a recent release by Glenmorangie. Per the ad copy, "Scots Gaelic for stone ‘Artein’ is an intriguing assemblage of 15 and 21 Years Old Glenmorangie, extra matured in ‘Super Tuscan’ wine casks." Those wine casks are said to be Sassicaia, a Bordeaux style Tuscan wine.
“Because I’m afraid God would ask me the same question.”
In music news on this date, Barbra Streisand's "The Way We Were" took over Number One in the States in '74. Sorry about that Tommy.
But you cannot keep me
( or yogurt- 2 tsp)
It was not so easy to choose, all your projects are wonderful. Thanks for playing with us
So, how did I learn to write? Well, actually, I suppose I was writing to some small extent before I could even read.
I don't speak Norwegian, but I think I was able to get the basic meaning of the text, based on similarities with other languages - and a lot of guessing. But then again, I could be wrong. If you speak Norwegian, please feel free to make any corrections.
The thing that I really love about resilience though is that it’s not one of those ‘genetic’ blessings we’re born with (or without). Maybe some of us instinctively have a little more than others. But on the whole, I believe, resilience is learnt. We can acquire skills, knowledge and experiences to make us more resilient.
Said the same things yesterday
She looked at me and beamed.
There is a Dark Moon this weekend.
I hadn't met them in person before, but talked a lot with Catrina leading up to the shoot. I asked her how they met, how they fell in love, and how he proposed.
The corn fritters are a MUST because what they do with the sauce is magnificent. The sandwich is juicy, the biscuits are hearty, and the creole bacon and vinaigrette I ordered on the “trying to be somewhat healthy” wedge salad was AMAZING. Bacon lovers, please check this place out if you ever find yourself in Austin.
Cardigan, Yellow tank, brown pencil skirt, necklace: Talbots
I'm a little late to hop on the bandwagon, but I'm currently obsessing over Toms. I feel like they would be a great addition to my Mommy wardrobe since I'm basically living in jeans, tees, and scarves these days. I would love each and every pair but these are a few of my favs. How am I ever supposed to pick which one?!? Perhaps I should start a collection...
This cheese is firm, almost crumbly. It has a sharp taste with a bit of tang. I would consider it full flavored and definitely a cheddar. In fact, it tasted pretty much as I had expected with an extra bit of zip. Chevre Noir is aged for a minimum of one year. Upon researching the cheese, the consensus seems to be that it improves further with age. The Cheese Boutique ages it on site for three years.
But lightning doesn’t last. It is a flash; it makes you blink.
"Pick that up! You're making a mess!"
Well, the new normal is WYSIWYG. Which is fine, but models are REALLY expensive!
Watching The Dark Horse (1932, directed by Alfred E. Green) is bound to give anyone who follows politics a case of deja vu. The players may change, the issues may change, but the process of politics, it seems, is constant. You could remake this film point for point, not changing anything, and it would feel completely contemporary. It certainly seems prescient in the wake of decades of politicians whose only qualifications are that they seem just like average Joes: the kind of guy you'd like to have a beer with, as a recent American head of state was oft described. This movie has a cynical view of politics that's positively Swiftian. Like the rulers of Laputa in Gulliver's Travels, the politicians in The Dark Horse are controlled by "flappers," who decide when they will speak and what they will say because they have no brains of their own.
imagine the da vinci code with (a) none of the offensive religion-slamming bullshit, (b) much more spunky lead--and a girl at that!, (c) much--I repeat, MUCH--hotter romance. That's TBoB&S for you. needless to say, it's one of my fave books of this year. i don't think i've EVER read any YA book with THIS much intrigue. the lush foreign locales--prague!, for e.g. (DOSAB, anyone?)--definitely helped!
U.S. Senate candidate Elizabeth Warren, a Democrat from Massachusetts and Harvard Professor who grew up in Oklahoma, is part Cherokee. Her great, great, great grandmother was Cherokee, making Warren 1/32 Cherokee. She has taken some heat for listing herself as part Cherokee and there is some speculation that her “minority” status helped her gain teaching positions, that she has been the beneficiary of affirmative action programs. I say good for her. Diversity is a good thing. All students who attend colleges and universities with a diverse student population benefit. And is not true that kids from underrepresented ethnic or racial groups could not get in otherwise. In fact, many of the kids might have gotten in if their race were not known on merit alone. In some cases, without affirmative action, they might be passed over, even though they meet all the qualifications.
"1550 Chairs Stacked Between Two City Buildings" location based installation by artist Doris Salcedo (2003) for the Istanbul Biennial.
- putting conditioner on my hair, rinsing it out, then wondering whether I put conditioner on my hair in the first place and putting more on.
After staying home with her children until the youngest started kindergarten, her career was in the toilet. But she put on her big girl panties, so to speak, and now she's a published freelance writer, experienced problogger, oft-quoted influencer, informative speaker, and savvy consultant whose clients have included Kleenex, Kenmore, LeapFrog, ConAgra Foods and Subaru. Click below to learn more about her work.
I'm also sorry that it's Wybie who crushes the hand at the end. Bring in a boy if you must but don't let him take anything away from Coraline's heroism and resourcefulness; in Gaiman's orginal she lures the hand to its destruction by a trick that requires a cool brain more than a hot head.
I've said goodbye to my all-powerful gigantic bags and hello to this small perfectly formed creature.
The insert is a piece of Dk. Purple CS that measures 4.50" x 2.50" and I cut a piece of marble purple paper a little smaller and attached it to the Dk. Purple CS (this is where you write your note). I stamped the PK flower face stamp and colored it with my copics. I cut some brances with a MS Punch and attached it all to the insert. Also added three purple pearls to the bottom of the flower pot.
Now, this is something I didn’t think I’d ever be saying, because (being the more cautious one of the two) I’m always finding reasons not to venture too far, or risk too much. ‘Daring to Fly’ was the most amazing success… it took on a life of its own pretty early on in its development, and Colin and I were bowled over by its reception. I genuinely wasn’t expecting people whom I didn’t recognise to come up to me and tell me how much they’d enjoyed it. And I certainly wasn’t expecting people to actually read it.
Coops xxx
The last of my SU! retired sets that I am selling at this time. These stamps are all $12.00 or less and most are in excellent used condition and many of the sets have one or two stamps mounted and the others are ready to by mounted. (It's a bad habit, but I often only mount what I'm going to use.) This will be your last chance to buy these sets from me. I am donating what I don't sell on December 15th.
We started this little project back in November. It started with painting the walls with one accent wall and then repainting the accent wall so it was the perfect shade of gray.
Along with pralines, marzipan and other assorted chocolates in the display case are Teuscher’s world-famous champagne truffles. Each dark chocolate conical shell, dusted with confectioner’s sugar, conceals perfectly creamy dark chocolate (made of cream, butter and cocoa), which, in turn, envelops the tell-tale caramel-colored champagne center. When you bite into one (for these should be relished with two, if not three, bites), the flavor of champagne is so strong that the only thing seemingly missing is the fizz. They’re delicate, decadent and perfect for the most special of occasions — like, say, today.
1 agreement
I’m deathly afraid of heights, so this one is not for me, but I hear the views are enchanting from the top. The Ferris wheel is located at the place de la Concorde; the cost is 5 euros for kids under 10, and 10 euros for the rest of us geezers. Read more here. Enjoy, brave souls!
SUNY New Paltz is a university comprised of 5 schools in New Paltz, NY, about 2 hours north of NYC, right on the Metro North Line. New Paltz, I saw for the first time, is a cute little Woodstock-like town.
Awareness about sex in the young
There was a little confusion over when the contest actually ended. Pia and I were under the assumption that the contest ended on different days, but we didn’t realize it. We were both right; we were both wrong. We just received conflicting information. Problem is, Pia thought the contest ended 24 hours before I did. So just like I was strategically saving entries for the last minute, so was she. Right before midnight (the day before I thought the contest ended), she entered a bunch of entries and took the lead. I thought I had another 24 hours to sweep in and win. Because of the confusion, the third place winner very generously gave up his winnings so that both Pia and I would win the grand prize money.
Until the late 18th century, the term referred to learned people of both sexes. However it subsequently became applied primarily to intellectual women. In time the name Bluestocking was applied solely to women of pedantic literary tastes. For a period, Bluestocking was a denigratory term, an insult, so much so, that it helped create a climate for generations of women who lived in fear of being labelled a 'bluestocking.' In the 19th century, the Brontë sisters and Mary Ann Evans (George Eliot) felt it necessary to hide their genius under male pseudonyms; in the 20th century the word conjured up images of desiccated female dons. The original 'blues' were much more various than this stereotype suggests, but their dilemmas about intellect, fashion and femininity are still with us today.
My friend, Terri, says she misses my posts and I know Sheri isn't on Facebook, so I'm going to write a quick post. I've been feeling kind of removed from friends and family anyway, so maybe blogging will help. We're having a really great time. Our week with the Waynforth family in Norfolk couldn't possibly have been any better. Our time in Greece was amazing (as was the food!) and we loved going back to Paris (to the same studio we stayed in last summer) and seeing Etienne and finally meeting the people we swapped houses with last year. I have lots of details to share, but this is just a quickie post so I'm saving details for later.
20. Santa Claus Is Watching You - Ray Stevens
Minutes later Bob calls my phone to tell me they had indeed called the house and said I’d won a ticket and that they needed to get in touch with me “immediately.”
No matter what you may deviate from, or mess up on, there is one thing I must insist on. It's something I always insist on - make sure you're using fresh mozzarella. The fresher the better! (I'm such a snob when it comes to cheese!)
My very first job at NBC in New York City was in the mail room. They called us mail boys back then and there were about twenty five of us. The dress code was jacket and tie at all times. And every hour on the hour we delivered the mail to the NBC offices throughout the RCA building in Rockefeller Center.
General Grant was about ten miles down river at Savannah, Tennessee, that morning. On April 4, he had been injured when his horse fell and pinned him underneath. He was convalescing and unable to move without crutches. Grant heard the sound of artillery fire and raced to the battlefield by boat, arriving about 8:30 a.m. He worked frantically to bring up reinforcements that seemed near enough to arrive swiftly, which included Lew Wallace‘s division from Crump’s Landing. However, he would wait almost all day before the reinforcements arrived. Wallace’s slow movement to the battlefield became particularly controversial. Several factors saved the Union forces on April 6. One, their forces under General Benjamin Prentiss managed to hold back a Confederate frontal assault for seven hours at a place called the Hornet’s Nest. Two, Grant kept his cool and did not cave in to the possibility that his army might be destroyed. But more importantly Beauregard failed to take advantage of the Union’s exposed flanks as they pulled back toward Pittsburg Landing, and continued focusing his troops at the Hornet’s Nest.
Thank you to Marty for the photos.
Communicated to Death – OBN IIIs
I Finally got to meet The Talented Trio from Hero Arts.....OMG I Love these Ladies so much....!!!
The classical ballet in this movie is lovely. There are some very ethereal effects for the time. Costumes are breathtaking. I feel that some of the issues that plague the dancers in this movie are less timely than the ones in The Turning Point, which is one reason that this movie is 2nd on the list.
Serve with your favorite pasta. (You could also make some killer meatball subs with this sauce)
I’m sure you’ve all heard of the movie The Artist by now. But have you seen it? Why, you simply must!
Wild Hop IPA, Harviestoun Brewery
Democratic Alliance for the Betterment and Progress of Scotland (Honkers)
Finish Line (Rod and Kris)
LDI, the mysterious former Seagram’s distillery that makes Redemption Rye, Templeton Rye, Bulleit Rye, and several other popular whiskeys, has finally been sold. When the deal closes, its new owner will be MGP Ingredients, Inc. The press release issued today by MGP can be found here.
Lenin lived in London and other parts of western Europe before returning to Russia as a revolutionary leader. The Ayatollah Khomeini flew in from Paris. Today, no city is more important in fomenting revolt in the Muslim world than London. The place is awash with exiles, and with British-born extremists. Rachid Ghannouchi, the leader of Tunisia’s version of the Muslim Brotherhood, the most significant global Islamist organisation, has been living here for several years. Last week, he returned to his country as the old regime fell. And although the Muslim Brotherhood began life in Egypt, and claims 20 million followers there, its power centres have grown in the West. Much of the propaganda for Hamas, and for one of the Brotherhood’s religious gurus, Yusuf Qaradawi (a big pal of Ken Livingstone), is generated here. Money from charity fund-raisers in Britain is used for its work in Egypt. The Muslim Association of Britain is the Brotherhood’s vehicle in this country. The Muslim Council of Britain, which supposedly represents all Muslims here, contains leaders who are highly sympathetic to the Brotherhood. We think of everything about the Middle East as “abroad”, but many of the truths about the state of the Muslim world are also home truths.
De las Almas el sustento.
Gee, Repug legislatures would never do that, would they?
"If we want to make and love art we move between times – the past, present and future. The continuous line is awe-inspiring and humbling, but we all share this sense of beauty and value. And we walk in the footsteps of so many who knew what it means to strive to be great at their craft."
After reading the conclusion of the series, I quickly turned back a couple of chapters and relived the ending once again. Mockingjay will dominate your thoughts hours after turning through the last pages. The last couple of pages definitely have some wet spots where my tear drops landed. Mockingjay was a wonderful end to an amazing series. I can honestly say that The Hunger Games series is one of the best out there. If you haven't read them yet, then do yourself a favor and immediately get a copy of The Hunger Games in your possession.
During the race, NASCAR actually ENCOURAGES you to get inside the action. My guess is that anywhere from 6 to 8 of every 10 spectators come equipped with scanners and headsets to listen to their favorite drivers, the radio broadcast, whatever.
1. What is your idea of the perfect day?
Knock Me Off My Feet by The King Khan Experience
Now it's your turn to show us your 'FAVOURITE COLOUR COMBO' cards!! There will be five free digi's given to one lucky challenge participant who will be chosen by Random.org at the end of the month! You may now use images from any company and still be included in the draw for the blog candy prize! Those who use one of Crissy's images, either from her rubber or digital collections will be entered twice in the draw.But please respect the rule of no more than three entries per month. Otherwise your
Maquillage GY865
Look for the Bears, if healthy, to have a strong season and be in playoff and even division contention.
Conceptual Art
Netflix charges $7.99 a month and you can watch it on a whole array of possible devices.
Enough, even, of this blog.
Last year, did you buy local wine at farmers' markets?
And I worry that someday my daughter will realize that her brother is different and she won't want him around. That she'll be embarrassed of him and his differences.
The Hoover Dam Collective had it's first real show at Station 171 in Greenpoint, and we are happy to return! It's a real life Brooklyn warehouse space, complete with all the strange and eclectic warehouse fixin's. The venue is fun because there is an incredible roof deck, where the outdoor barbeque and some live performances will take place. Just in case you're skimming the article:
2 sign
That pretty much sums it up. Which is why, as Hal put it earlier this morning, that 240-page stack makes me smile, even if the world, when all is said and done, declines to care about it with me.
This has been the hardest post to do, as there are many fashion trends this season and the post would be so long if i was to incorporate them all. so i picked key trends that i thought were appropriate for school/college/university students.
Me: I slipped and as I fell the razor went with me and my leg landed on it.
A blast sizzled through the air. The Erebus howled. Bryce rose higher.
One more thing before I tap out... I know I said I was gonna do a Brewvie Review for From Paris With Love next. However, I've seen a slew of movies since then, so which would you prefer a BR on? Shutter Island, Edge of Darkness, Daybreakers, Sherlock Holmes, From Paris with Love, When In Rome, The Bounty Hunter, Valentine's Day, The Road, or The Wolfman?
In May 2009 she called me that she was in hospital and that "things" were not looking good. Marieke was diagnosed with cancer. Shortly after that she started a blog "Ik wou dat ik een toverstafje had" which translates "I wish I had a magic wand". The blog is a wonderful written testimony of a feisty girl with an enormous stamina. Unfortunately her spirit was conquered by her unreliable body.
me, I love the stuff!
a practical, informative, and easy to read. Written with a great mix of
i have a bunch of spring tour stops coming up, and now that they've all been sort-of-officially-finalized, i wanted to share in case any of you wonderful people happen to be in any of these cities. i'd really love to meet you if you're going to be around! we've actually got a shiny Spring Into the Future 2012 tour facebook page with all the details, and we're currently hosting a series of giveaways (lots and lots of awesome books stuffed into a lovely spring tote bag), so if you'd like to win some free books, you can always check it out! it's super simple to participate; all you have to do is 'Like' the page and you'll automatically be entered to win.
These new fermenters will help them do so.
Dried Medjool Date
Thank you, again and again for being the wonderful souls and friends that you are. I hope the sun keeps shining and the stars sparkle even brighter each night wherever you are!
In my defence, I haven’t used the RSI device glibly. Its details didn’t come from comfy googling, they were earned.
Nov, 21st: Cafe Wagner / Jena (DE)
With the market booming, more bodies are needed, both to handle the influx of volume and to manage fallout when Account Executives peace-out to work for a competitor. This doesn’t happen a lot, but it’s a common enough occurrence that corporate began hitting up college campuses over the last year to recruit some of the “finest talent in the country”. As they say.
"I feel terrible for that little girl."
12.- Move In, Ride Out - Produced by DJ Rob
There could be a reason all those women are virgins, and it may prove to be absolutely no fun. Besides, even in Heaven, I'd suspect them of lying about it. Or something. No, just a few for the novelty, and the rest without such complications.
½ cup white vinegar in final rinse
The golf course developer has nearly finished his land- fill operation and has been lobbying the council to reduce the size of the golf course down to 9 holes instead of the planned 18! He wants a substantial housing/retail/industrial allocation near the A27 end for a substantial development. He is also seeking a housing allocation north of the proposed BHA site for an additional 400 houses. This is how we have arrived at our projection of up to 1200 houses eventually.
Okay, I know people might tell me that a good Philly Steak Sandwich should be from Philadelphia. Since I didn't get to travel to Philly, I figured what difference is there. The only thing I can compare is the Philly Steak Sandwich that I had back home from a bistro and from Phat Philly.
my love…
That was before new management took over. The owner has to be one of the most unpleasant people I’ve ever met. I don’t know what she expected from owning a bar, but it’s clearly not the career path she wanted. We’ve had quite a few run-in’s with her bad attitude, and we’re more than tired of it. Oh, and I forgot to mention that she spends most of her night talking to her friends at one end of the bar so it takes about an hour to get a drink.
* Papers - All from my scraps
2. Project Manager and Project Advisors 3
I planted out the rest of the bed that I started planting with seeds on Sunday. (For reference sake, the broc/caul bed is the 2nd furthest south, and the bed I’ve seeded is furthest south… I’ll proceed northward toward the heat of the street with warmer season crops.) I didn’t really plan to do this, but I have a bunch of allium family seeds that I didn’t plant last year (because of the fallow year because of allergies). I wound up using a lot of them up today; onion family seeds don’t keep very long… the germination rate really falls off after a year. So I decided I’d see what would come of these seeds, and if I don’t get good results, I’ll plant more carrots, or lettuce, or spinach, or whatever. So here’s what went in (and my hub should be ecstatic–he’s an allium freak):
This book has a collection of 15 “maps” — exercises — for you to do to discover your “Great Work”.
I have to first doff my cap to two Mitchells and Butlers bars that have genuinely surprised me with the depth and range of beers available behind their doors this year. Curlers Rest in Glasgow's west end and The Drum and Monkey in the city centre have pleasantly exceeded my expectations. The Drum and Monkey, in particular, has become a byword for consistency, quality and a cracking choice of beers from Scotland and across the rest of the UK. The beers are always well maintained and it is clear that the staff recognise the importance of sound cellarmanship. The sumptious surroundings and the pork scratchings all add to the experience. As does the stunning ceiling.
Now, I'm happy she had in mind a thank you theme because, firstly, we don't celebrate Thanksgiving here, so I would be totally at a loss with this one and secondly, I was just about to make a thank you card for my son's teacher. It's not for a special occasion; just a gift as if from the kiddos:) Hope she will like it.
What the officers find out from Grandma Moses-Her dentist from years ago looked like a famous black and white old time movie star, he wanted to get her in bed with him, and she was sure this was him trying to make his move.
She promptly came home and started a list of everything we were buying the next day. It is great to dream through the eyes of a child. Her disappointment only lasted 5 seconds the next day when she realized we didn’t wake up any richer than we went to bed.
She called the peace prize a recognition of the struggle for women’s rights not only in Yemen and Liberia, but anywhere that women face oppression.
we took a free dance class
Developing pilot program for school integration
Because we really didn’t have a winter it feels strange titling a post “Spring 2012″ but let’s roll with it shall we?
20. Has the care and concern of the hyungs, the love and care of the noonas, it’s really nice. If only he can see his family more…Hyung, saranghae…
Location: White Oak Road to Trestik Road
We moved in to our rural enclave 3 days before our first child was born. Talk about not knowing anything about rural life or farming; when asked before we moved in if we would be willing to sell our hay to a neighbouring farmer, we didn’t know “where” the hay was. The first few years we kept our experimenting to gardening, although we did switch from a manageable plot near the house to a quarter-acre garden plot “down the back.”
We never managed to get very far into the module, because the first part, Steading of the Hill Giant Chief, is a real slog -- and my friend's teenage brother was a ruthless referee. I don't believe any of us actually died at his hands, but we were hurting. The Steading is just packed with hill giants and their servants and our referee was very good at using them. To our credit, we managed to outsmart him on quite a few occasions, among being to stir up dissent amongst the hill giant's orcish slaves so as to create a useful distraction for our own activities. We had a lot of fun, partly because we got to play high-level characters, something we'd never done before, and partly because we were playing with "the cool kids," or at least what we assumed were cool kids, since we had so little experience of coolness ourselves.
Drink at least eight glasses of water a day
Natural Bridge Caverns. Recognized as a national natural landmark, the caverns were discovered 50 years ago by spelunking college students. They offer several different types of tours…everything from the popular walking tour, to lantern tours, and even adventure tours.
17. Compared to this time last year, are you:
16This I say then, Walk in the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the lust of the flesh.
On a different note, we see huge benefits for the volunteers who participate in making programmes. They come shy and inexperienced but soon have vastly improved confidence and communication skills to mention several, through organising and completing a production’.
Never, do we think of him,
embossing folders
One example of the Arabization of non-Arab Muslims can be seen in the Pashtuns, many of whose customs were regarded in the earliest ethnographies as “Arabized.” In particular, honor killings and the idea that the tribe or nation’s esteem and honor revolves around women upholding a chaste sexual ideal was an idea imported from the Arabs. Extreme hospitality may have been one too.
Well, my loyal three and a half readers? what do you think?
–PEREGRINE FALCON, Basin 3, same, same.
I think that does it for me today. I am off to get chores done before the weekend. I hope I get some stamping time in while the hubby watches football. I hope you get to stamp too. Have a great weekend!
Two and a half years ago, Dave Block, 44, lost his job as a toll collector for the South Bay Expressway.
Question: How do you view the Orthodox presence in America in terms of these apocalyptic things? What is the apocalyptic significance of Orthodoxy in America?
I tried to picture Danny and Tara as actual human beings, fumbling and bumping, horny and sweaty. Not movie stars is some dimly-lit “artistic” montage. I actually got turned on envisoning the scene and writing it so I felt that I must have done something right, but I was nervous as a cat when I handed out the copies for everyone to take home and read. What would they think of it? Would I come across as crass, or — worse — silly and immature?
“You’re not supposed to think about it so much,” he said. “People don’t think about it so much, they just lead their lives.” Caught himself, injected a smile into the rest: “You’ll know you’re well when you just get up and go to school or work and have lunch and don’t think about it.”
In the meantime, if you don’t have a smart phone (in my world I pretend everyone has a cell phone because it makes me feel happy) then is this just one more reason on the list that you should? Or are you happy with the simplicity of the “just for dialing” cell phone that you have? And if you have a smart phone what do you use it for related to your health? I use it for looking up those health conditions that I perceive I have – rosacea is a good example as I have it and just went thru a major flare up and the internet has been my friend and confuser in trying to find some way to treat it. What do you use it for?
We are asking our Give a Blessing friends to stand with us, arm and arm, as we raise awareness and funds for the Hoffman Family. They are in need of our prayers, our support and our love.
Bill doesn't think he has to do much when he returns home, but child support has other ideas. Will Bill turn his life around and create a good environment for his two sons? It turns out he not only has to clean his living quarters, but also win over the love of his older son as well as rid his younger son's drug-running occupation.
(notes from SEO class - I need a do over because I didn't understand everything, so I drew. Reminded me of how I felt in college!)
PetSmart:
Soon after taking the throne and banishing his little brother, he then found out about that his wife and his own brother had been having a affair. Pissed off he decided to exact his revenge (and in those time payback, was horribly uneven.) Atreus took a play out of his grandfather's book and had his brother's children brought to him and killed, he had their body parts cut up and cooked (save for their hands and feet) Atreus then allowed his brother to return for dinner. And it was after Thyestes had finished his dinner that Atreus revealed what he had cooked for him. To add further insult to injury, Atreus taunted his brother with HANDS AND FEET of Thyestes' sons! (This guy clearly one upped his grandfather) Thyestes immediately fled in disgust, but not before cursing his brother and his family. (Let's see next week how this effects Atreus and his family. (I'll give you a hint, it doesn't end well)
In other news, the fact that the MSM took their time picking up this story has not gone unnoticed. There can be no clearer indication that the MSM are failing miserably at their jobs – reporting the news! With all their resources they were all beaten to the story by Malaysiakini and RPK. Congratulations are due to both Malaysiakini and RPK for their scoop.
LMGTE Am class: Like the LMGTE Pro, but the regulations stipulate that there must be no more than one professional driver per vehicle.
Austin, TX is a really awesome place I would love to show you around.
Patients, loved ones and professionals can be left feeling frightened and totally helpless in the face of such immense suffering.
When it comes to Arlington, it can’t just be described in words. You get the sights, sounds and aromas that keep visitors traveling to and from Arlington year round. It can’t just be described as “fun” for someone to believe it.
Well, a narrow field this year, seeing as I hardly attended any gigs. Rock 'n' roll, eh? (Though I did see a mesmerising performance of classical Indian music in an Edinburgh church a couple of weeks ago.)
thingy is we don't got no more furiends email addies!
04 Monkey Trick
Present myself as I want to appear, get back into my hippie styles that I adore.
Some weeks ago we had a maskuline challenge,
“What took you so long?” Reilly tried not to look annoyed.
Change up the traditional use of ribbon on a gift wrapped package by using twine instead. Choose a bright color to coordinate for any occasion. For a more masculine look, use jute.
I still love this old metal seed bin. I bought it several months ago with the intent of hanging it in my studio. It was too long for the space and I couldn't bring myself to cut it, so I decided to pass it along to someone else. I cut the numbers out of the heavy duty vinyl on my Silhouette and stuck them on instead of painting them on.
Moisturize- A requirement with almost all hair types; however, absolutely essential in natural hair care. Moisture can be derived from several sources. The best way to keep hair & scalp moisturized is: diet & vitamin supplements, water (or hydration), use of protective sleep-wear on hair (i.e. satin/silk scarves or bonnets), and using moisture-based prods (including shampoos, conditioners & oils).
* Bridgestone Arena is a great venue... but don't they have air-conditioning? It was hotter than heck.
Impressions of a Medic at Impressions of a Medic at Mighty Men - 28 April 2009
Both are by Jennifer Adams with art by Alison Oliver, and I am madly in love with them. I only wish the publishers had also sent me Pride and Prejudice: A Counting Primer and Romeo and Juliet: A County Primer as well. I mean, these books are just cool. Everything about them is right, from the feel of the thick pages to the colors to, of course, the text and artwork.
Cook until golden brown on each side. Serve with maple syrup, apple butter, bacon, orange juice and eggs.
Wallace
Simply put - if I didn't have the surgery, our baby boy would most likely die.
Hi there! Hope you all had a great weekend! I loved having an extra day off for President's Day...even hubby got the day off! We decided to head out of town yesterday for the day and visit Bodega Bay and the Tomales Bay area where we hunted for Sea Shells, hiked a little and picked up some Salt Water Taffy. There was also a trip to Chipotle involved...I love that place! The kids had a great time and it was nice to get out of town for a bit, even if it was just for the day. Did you do anything fun??
No self-respecting 13-year-old and up wants to be seen in the Children's section amid the picture books and novelties. Better by far to have their own section, which will also include books written for adults but thought to have teen appeal.
nailpolish: 'Aqua Cool' by Rimmel London
I cannot hear the motor when the drone
3 permutations
Te reaction of a normal, sensible person would be that to claim NO effect on value is preposterous.
Bake for about 12 minutes or until bubbly and browned. The longer you bake these, the firmer they will be.
esteems
If I do not take the time to take a long hard look at myself.
Talking of food, I have ordered two Paleo books to further my research, and have a million podcasts on my phone to listen to. I’ll let you know how I get on!
His—their mark remained. “I will wait for you, darling. As I promised.”
Mister Death's Blue Eyed Girls by Mary Downing Hahn
Debit and credit – - David Albrecht
High point: Meeting the family
Of course, if overseas Malaysians vote via postal votes then this would raise other problems. As it is, the 250,000 or so ‘postal’ votes are a bone of contention because the ballot boxes are switched. But that is merely an implementation issue, which can easily be overcome.
When we kissed
I am still trying to figure myself out.
No I'm not doing a re-run of the Gobbledok (lol who is old enough to remember that!!) I am talking chippie chippie Chipboard!!!
GARROSH: …Yep.
Miss Baby K turning 1 made me think about my own little babies turning 1.
Although most of the players I grew up watching are still functioning normally, it seems inevitable that many of them will suffer the same fate as their predecessors. However, if the NFL can make an unwavering commitment to helmet safety and technology, hopefully the next generation of football fans can enjoy watching their favorite players live a full life after football.
“Okey-dokey.”
Over which the great sky stretches
Today we are off to visit with our long time friends from CA who moved here after we left CA. They have visited us several times in MN and this is our first trip to NC, seemed each time we planned something in life switched the plan. The four of us go back to about 1969 in Fair Oaks; for a time Nevin was in Vietnam with the army and Alicia who is Panamanian stayed there with the kids. When we are together she and I both talk at the same time, making others ears very numb, but I learned this technique long ago with her otherwise I would not get in a word. We both can keep up with our dual conversations to the amazement of observers. There is something beyond the familiar or comfort in these long time connections, that is unexplainable. Perhaps surviving life's bumps and billows leaves us with a deeper appreciation of knowing one another.
We all use these things in our work at one point or another so this challenge should pose no problems, but if you need some fabulous inspiration to get your mojo working then look no further than below. My design team have come up with some absolutely gorgeous designs to inspire you with this challenge.
I cannot wait to show this brass dome lamp off in her new home, my office. Can you imagine?!! It is going to reside on my new white Parsons desk. She is definitely going to steal the show. I honestly am more pleased with her than I would be with an actual vintage piece. No offense. This lamp has an enormous, oversized dome which makes it even more dramatic. We all know, I love the drama.
One cool thing about this video is the Customize option, letting you choose which workouts you’d like to do. That is convenient because this way your workout is uninterrupted, as it shifts from one segment to the next for you. The cardio set is pretty fun; Bob really keeps you moving to get that heart pumping and burn calories. He also incorporates handweights into the some of the moves for an added challenge. The cool down is mostly a mixture of yoga poses, which I really love.
I removed my small feet and drew a flag, a jersey, and a national anthem. Then I waited and hoped, like all my people. I waited and hoped that she would reappear so that I might show her my country. The woman died and I grew up. I killed my imagination even as I continued to practice the sins of hope and waiting. Here, a kid puts his nail in the sand and tries to build a home, but it rained.
Noise, Light, Traffic and Parking
A Long Fast Ride
Bits of her held in bubbles,
The collection deals with all sort of issues, problems and experiences which will be so familiar to primary age kids - such as tests, wet play, the class hamster -
Of “quality” big men, the Celtics currently are sporting Jermaine O’Neal who, like Shaq, is a player well past the prime of his career. For Jermaine O’Neal, injuries have been a big problem throughout his career, and at the age of 31 he doesn’t have the same explosiveness in his legs that he had in years past. Jermaine O’Neal can still do good things for a team but is just not a solid enough interior presence. In his last 3 seasons he has maxed out at 7 rebounds per game and not to mention being constantly in and out of the line-up.
Other things we are enjoying together include lots of good books. She's particularly into Aesop's Fables (and listening to a Jim Weiss CD of them in the car), DK's First Encyclopedia of the Human Body, and lots of books about how things are made or how things work. The librarians have given me some pretty funny looks as we come in with our usual, "We'd like a book on how _______ are made." She loved some we checked out recently that showed how tennis shoes are made and what it's like to be a textile worker. And speaking of factories, she asked me to stay out of hers for several days because she was working on this....
You start to say "in my day" - without any deprecating old man impression.
Sipping that teacup, flavoured holy-matrimony.
Officially my title is Patient Access Representative I. What that means is that I check people into the emergency room if they are barfing too much or they picked up a rabid bat or they got stabbed. You know, whatever. Take their name, address, insurance, etc, and put them into the computer. I'm kinda like Jerry on ER, but different.
"I don't know," he answered bumfuzzled. "All I saw was a couple of 70 year old women on treadmills."
Many people have written me to ask how I came up with Mojoey. The answer is simple. I did not come up with it. Like any nickname, it was given to me by others. I’ve had many nicknames over the years. Every thing from “Red”, to “The Mad Irishman”, to ” big guy” and even “grumpy”. A friend from work even calls me "Shrek", which I think is halariouis. I picked up Mojoey by way of a linguistic accident while working in France in 99. The staff of the facility I was working in referred to me a Gros Joe (pronounced “Grow Jo”). Now Grow Jo was not a pretty nickname, they were making fun of me because I was twice their average size and weight. I was not offended, but some of my American co-works were quite taken aback by this. They resolved to find me a better nickname.
Monday - Chicago style deep dish pizza
The bottom piece has been rubbed to within an inch of it's life.
BS-8599-1 kits have been designed to be more user friendly in a way that makes the contents instantly visible and more secure, this in turn has helped to improve and simplify selection for employers and specifiers.
I wonder if people are giving them too much credit because of what Slow’s means to the city in terms of hopes for a turnaround. These guys could’ve opened anywhere else, but they chose to make a go of it in the heart of urban blight. There’s no arguing how commendable that is. But the cynic in me thinks that the lure of incredibly cheap rent made opening it and turning a profit a lot easier. And I wonder if a big portion of the appeal is that it’s sooo different from it’s surroundings. It’s like when an average-looking person surrounded by heinously ugly people starts to look a heckuva lot better. In this case, you have an above average restaurant across the street from this -
“I’m Broke & Proud” feat Hasan Salaam
MUSKEGON HEIGHTS — the singing took be concerned of itself, said Le’Andria Johnson, season three winner of BET’s “Sunday Best” gospel singing competition.
And while these strategies served me well in situations where I was powerless, they also put me in jeopordy in situations that I could have done something about.
nowadays that sounds kind of cold-hearted, doesn't it?
“Nor can I imagine. I shall be a riot. I know just the sort of stuff that’s needed—simple, manly, optimistic stuff straight from the shoulder. This shoulder,” said Gussie, tapping. “Why I was so nervous this morning I can’t imagine. For anything simpler than distributing a few footling books to a bunch of grimy-faced kids I can’t imagine. Still, for some reason I can’t imagine, I was feeling a little nervous, but now I feel fine, Bertie—fine, fine, fine—and I say this to you as an old friend. Because that’s what you are, old man, when all the smoke has cleared away—an old friend. I don’t think I’ve ever met an older friend. How long have you been an old friend of mine, Bertie?”
Dennis Canty from Seattle finds US 728 on Craigslist and writes:
02 - sid king and the five strings - let er rip
No one gets through life without loss and sorrow, without times when grief overwhelms our ability to cope, without some instances of bad luck, injury or disease. It is our responsibility as a community to share the burdens, not to let them fall on individuals or isolated families, and especially, not to let them fall on children who have the least resources with which to meet them.Something is terribly wrong with our values and priorities when we spend billions of dollars to kill and begrudge the cost of healing and care for children, and for adults.
1 Tablespoon juice from California Hot Mix
The baby’s going to be born in time to go to college.
That would mean already hard-pressed households having to fork out an extra £240 a year.
After Winter put her cake in the oven, she went to the store, leaving her husband Adam "in charge." Adam, a self-professed "excellent baker" from waaaaaay back, took it upon himself to exhume their daughter's birthday sheet cake from the oven and frost it. How hard could it be, right? You pop that sucker out of the oven, cut it in half, plop it on a plate, and slather the creamy stuff all over it, just like you do to your face in the morning. He must have been thinking, When she sees what I have done for her, I am so getting laid tonight.
I breastfeed her. He was on formula. We swaddled Wilson, we don't with Callie.
None of the three was happy and they all tried their best. Ladies tried to change the little boy, to fix him, to straighten him up and have him do what they wanted him to do. And the boy tried to emotionally survive. And it was obvious he did not stand much chance.
But if our pervasive right to liberty and equality were suddenly taken away and we were dropped into some exotic and seemingly attractive culture in say, Somalia or China or Saudi Arabia or the Maldives, the lack of natural freedom and equality would be shockingly noticeable.
The better your inventory, the less likely you’ll have difficulty with the claim. Almost everyone has a digital camera that can take stills and probably even videos. The combination of the images as well as a written description will help you replace the belongings and serve as proof to the insurance company.
Pink Frost- Who I Belong To
What will be your legacy of friendship? I hope that I will be the friend who can comfort you, support you when you are hurt, angry, sad. I hope that I can make you laugh today. I hope that I never intentionally harm a friend to hurt their psyche, their smiling eyes, their heart. I hope that I listen carefully, keep your secrets. I hope that if we are close enough we can be honest with the stories in our hearts and to tell each other if there is spinach in our teeth.
Friend: So what’s been going on with you?
Now off to the gym…back to study and go into work early again to do it all over…like a boss.
OFFICIAL RULES
Anyone else terrified by the fact that he was a teacher? Was this a guy just doing his duty, or a bloodthirsty murderer? Did he die in prison or become a Canadian miner?
That part I am not so excited about, but I told her I would do it and I'm not going to leave her hanging. I had to go get fitted today at the clothing store, which was both comical and depressing all at the same time.
Thank you all for you wishes and kind comments, it means a lot to me.
‘I just want to leave,’ she says.
and it was totally you, molly.
Oh, I also got hit by a tro-tro on Monday. Which has absolutely nothing to do with this story but I thought it was worth mentioning.
I asked him why he went to fight – in retrospect a stupid question. “I had to protect my family. We were only a group of boys, but we held the Serbs back long enough for our mothers and sisters to escape. I could not allow the Serbs to capture our women.”
And I discovered that Cambridge awarded the first degrees to women in 1948! Now that may still seem like ancient history to many readers but it was only sixteen years before I went up to Newnham. I had no idea that the privilege I enjoyed and abused in the '60s had been so recent. Cambridge took women on as students before Oxford, though the latter awarded degrees to them in 1920. Durham did better than either, awarding degrees to women in 1895 - howway the lasses!
Tragedy dogged the group throughout its brief career. During the sessions, Clapton was devastated by news of the death of Jimi Hendrix; eight days previously the band had cut a cover of “Little Wing” as a tribute to Hendrix. On 17 September 1970, one day before Hendrix’s death, Clapton had purchased a left-handed Fender Stratocaster that he had planned to give to Hendrix as a birthday gift. Adding to Clapton’s woes, the Layla album received only lukewarm reviews upon release. The shaken group undertook a U.S. tour without Allman, who had returned to the Allman Brothers Band. Despite Clapton’s later admission that the tour took place amidst a veritable blizzard of drugs and alcohol, it resulted in the live double album In Concert.[34] The band had recorded several tracks for a second album in London during the spring of 1971 (five of which were released on the Eric Clapton box-set Crossroads), but the results were mediocre.
Countering Interior Minister Rehman Malik’s diatribe, Punjab Chief Minister Shahbaz Sharif said on Wednesday that he will leave politics for good if any evidence of corruption is given against his family.
during quiet-time, she always has a craft ready and waiting to go for syd.
(Girl was really hot)
So many things to choose from.
Now that I’m coming towards the end of my first year of university I felt the most important thing I learnt in this module was the circle of fifths. I felt it was so important because it shows the relationships among the 12 tones of the chromatic scale, their corresponding key signatures, and the associated major and minor keys. In other words the circles design is very helpful in composing and harmonizing melodies, building chords and moving different keys in a composition.
Team wise and aside from the keeper issue Kenny appears to have few problems particularly as Agger and Johnson returned from injury on Tuesday. Maxi, after his two goals on Tuesday, should be in contention however I suspect he was bought so other players could rest? Elsewhere apparently JW Henry is unavailable he’s gone to Boston to watch the rounders, a prior engagement or a statement about where the FA Cup lies in his priorities?
(This is not the first time, by the way, that FBI "informants" were allowed to commit murder while receiving FBI protection. It recalls the Irish mobs in Boston who were given FBI protection for over twenty years, in particular the Whitey Bulger gang. It has taken the FBI decades to mitigate the stink of their long-term participation in the Boston Black Mass, which included covering up numerous murders by their "informants.")
This is the third book in the Body Finder series by Kimberly Derting. I'm a massive fan of this series and have been eagerly anticipating the release of 'The Last Echo' for months. I'm pleased to say that it didn't disappoint at all and I think it might actually be my favourite so far.
I am searching for someone but don’t see him anywhere.
My blog, specifically?
First off, I couldn’t believe that the volume of traffic DIDN’T slow down for me
I mentioned in a previous blog that when I first joined the police, it was not unusual to be called to the old Victorian hospital on my area to assist in restraining patients who were being medicated against their will under the Mental Health Act. It seem intuitive – mental health colleagues facing violence and danger from someone who is also a risk to themselves, the police have a duty to prevent harms and risks like this so surely there is a legal authority to do it?!
The stories they most enjoy are the "slightly more gory ones" says Coats, with Heracles and his labours often a favourite. "They enjoy it when they bring back the cowardly king something nasty and the king hides from him in a jar, and of course when he has to shovel all the horse poo from the Augean stables in a single day."
Billmon, the greatest political blogger ever, whose self-imposed exile I still have not recovered from, on occasion posts to his diary at Daily Kos, which is one of the few reasons I visit that site.
Dailai Lama does not have a full, comprehensive knowledge in quantum physics.
The kids and I sorted out some of their special (not every day) art supplies. Put them into bins and then I made labels for them. I used 3x5 Avery Labels then I went to the Avery website and created these labels in minutes.
When the first star appears, that’s my cue to go back inside. As summer wears on it takes longer and longer for that star to appear. I let the screen door slam behind me and I listen for the two usual taps against the jamb. The rocker remains alone and the paint will peel for at least another promise.
The Acer Iconia Tab A200 is one of three new tablets from Acer in 2012, and the runt of the litter.
She was allegedly told by Mr Patrick Tay to find a higher paying job in order to buy the HDB flat during a Meet-the-People session.
Björk wasn't having that and along with the other Sugarcubes she showed that it was "okay to mingle with the aliens".
As rightly said it was the Japanese that started Chick Sexing. I believe they now identify sex's of chicks by their feathers. My dad once worked beside Bernard Mathews. He used his Mansion house to raise turkey's before I believe renovating it later. Dad went to work for Hensalls somewhere near Mansfield's Forest Town from where we lived in my childhood. It was a nice home then but now a new housing estate. I got bitten by a cockerel protecting chickens in our orchard as tried to grab some lovely victoria plums. I still have that scar on my knee after all those years. I can imagine what happened to big red ears. One of the last times with dad was hunting for a vixen fox that had got in one of the hen sheds. I was told to stay back from the sheds but obviously much red blood abounded. We never seen the fox where got through the hedge and fencing. The firm I believed called Hemsall's went bankrupt with the owner taking off abroad to what I was told the Canary Islands without paying any of the staff months of pay, at this time the industry was in decline as the former HB hatchery can confirm. Father did much travelling by car in late 50's and seemed to be in much demand until the mid sixties. My gran was always telling dad to invest in property at same time, so the former HB hatchery's owners had at least good sense and in turn have helped employment.
Personally I feel I see newer and newer faces every year which occassionally makes me wonder how many long time neighborhood residents drop in. After all the while Habana Outpost is relatively new (opened in 2005) and there is a history of this sort of eclectic mix of social interaction (food, movies, flea markets) in Brooklyn culture in general and Fort Green/Bed Stuy in particular. For example the West Indian Day Parade and to a slightly smaller degree the African Street Festival have provided a mix culture, food and social atmosphere for over 35 years in Brooklyn and while I see residents from Fort Green and Bed-Stuy at those events I feel like I don't see as many of those locals at the newer great establishments like Habana. It makes me wonder if long time residents feel as inclined to drop in as I do.
Dean Henderson Says: May 24, 2011 at 10:38 am
Is the argument any good? Well, note the change in premise (1) from the version in the harm prevention argument. One might argue that this change is both crucial and problematic. It is crucial because without it the deterrence based objection to intervention without liability won’t work. It is problematic because it may claim too much for the criminal justice system. Should we really aim to prevent as much harm as possible? Probably not, especially if doing so will also prevent us from doing other things that we might value. Whether deterrence actually do that is a question worth pursuing. All I’ll say here is that by using deterrence as the justification for imposing liability, we may slide down the slope towards totalitarianism. After all, totalitarian societies might be very safe places to live, but they achieve this at the expense of other values.
was given me
KOKORASKRASATOS 27
I don't care what colour your skin is
Six Degrees of Separation (John Guare)
Especially without a trial (and 98% of felony cases end in plea bargains), the adversarial system seldom provides victims that much-desired opportunity to tell their story. Yet any practitioner will tell you that, without plea bargains, the entire system would collapse under its own weight. Ditto for making victims a straight-up party to plea bargains; indeed, most crime victims likely wouldn't want that responsibility.
So the story of Sodom and Gomorrah, therefore, is almost certainly intended as a condemnation of idol worshippers, and of a greedy and inhospitable society that sought to treat visitors in a threatening manner – which was also a sin, to the early Jews, by the way.
"YEAH.....YEAH....WHAT ABOUT IT MAN?"
A Brief bibliography: Thomas Schriener, “Circumcision” in Dictionary of Paul and his Letters, 137-139; Robert G. Hall, “Circumcision”, in Anchor Bible Dictionary, 1:1025-1031; Raymond E. Brown, “Not Jewish and Gentile Christianity But Types of Jewish/Gentile Christianity” CBQ 45 (1983) 74–79; J. M. Sasson, “Circumcision in the Ancient Near East” JBL 85 (1966) 473–76.
Opening your heart and smiling are directly related so smiling needs to be done all the time for the heart to open even though you may not initially want to smile that much. Opening your heart is an enjoyable experience and something that naturally makes you smile freely and happily and you will probably not notice that you have been smiling for such a long time without any effort when you have the right attitude.
Two years later, I don't need any one else to make me feel good about myself. All I need to do is look at the relationships I have with my kids, my students, my co-workers, and with Jen, and that is all the affirmation I need now.
So, i will only be making smaller boxes, and some larger ones out of what i have already in my hands.
A few nights ago, I dreamt that I was on an oil rig in the middle of what was a very calm sea. I turned to look out of one of the windows and saw a humungus tidal wave heading towards the rig. Not only did this powerful tidal wave engulf the structure but it knocked it sideways into the sea.
Section 2. People, person, or persons as used in this Constitution does not include corporations, limited liability companies or other corporate entities established by the laws of any state, the United States, or any foreign state, and such corporate entities are subject to such regulation as the people, through their elected state and federal representatives, deem reasonable and are otherwise consistent with the powers of Congress and the States under this Constitution.
Nik Kershaw Wouldn’t it be good UK
Here, you will be the one to set the payment for site completion and your referral will be the one to complete trial offers (at this stage of the game, you will not be completing trail offers any longer – unless of course you want to add more sites to your portfolio). So here are the steps in this method:
But back to that word viand. It actually traces back to Latin for “to live.” That makes sense. Eat to live, man. And how about this: in Palawano the word they use to be “full” from eating, has the same root (biag) as the word “to live.”
our life has been on hold a bit as our best friend's welcomed a little man into all of our lives. please meet...keller benjamin wright. our godson. not my grandson. a little type-o i made on instagram and twitter. he is so precious and handsome.
Linda and Jeff Hamilton
We again compare this account of Saul’s conversion with that of Acts 9:16. “For I will show him how great things he must suffer for my name’s sake.” This, obviously, is referring to future revelations. Now in Acts 22:14, “That thou shouldest hear the voice of his mouth.” This also speaks of things God will reveal to him in the course of time. This harmonizes with 2 Corinthians 12:1. “I will come to visions and revelations of the Lord.” With visions, he saw the Lord, and with revelations, he heard His voice.
To survive, seventeen-year-old Greta has hidden her humanity and taken the job of bounty hunter—and she’s good at what she does. So good, she’s caught the attention of Mylena’s young Goblin King, the darkly enticing Isaac, who invades her dreams and undermines her determination to escape.
Laurie Faliano
The new collection features a wide variety of pieces that range from fun and flirty bodysuits to robes and girdles. The Hera Robe is the perfect basic to welcome in spring with. The tulle and stretch charmuse make it it feel light as air, and the bright colors will perk you up every time you put it on.
So what is it that we’ve been doing that is and isn’t “school” at the same time? I said in an earlier post that we keep a looser schedule in December, but that doesn’t mean we’ve just thrown everything to the wind. Ian still gets up and goes jazz band practice at 7:20 every morning. That gives me about 45 minutes to infuse my veins with a pot of coffee and Eva a chance to roll out of bed and find some fresh clothes. Some mornings at around 8:15, we go up to the university and play racquetball with Jamie and walk the track. Other mornings, we jump right into math.
Deep fry the strips, few at a time in hot oil.
